      'Two weeks after a Robert Geiger news story coined a name for this event, Hugh Bennett was made director of a new agency within the Interior Department. This event prompted the Soil Conservation Act, as it was partly caused by cattle overgrazing. Dorothea Lange’s iconic photograph Migrant Mother depicts a family during, for ten points, what event in which "Okies" attempted to move to California to avoid severe drought during the Great Depression?',                                                                                                                             
      'Genseric captured this city after his betrothal to Eudocia was broken, and Alaric was able to capture this city after the death of Stilicho. The Battle of the Allia led to the capture of this city, which was forced to measure out ransom money using weighted scales by Brennus. Romulus Augustulus was deposed after the capture of this city in 476 AD. For ten points, name this city that was sacked several times during the fall of its Italy-based empire.',                                                                                                                              
      'This kingdom was briefly controlled by Britain after the arrival of the HMS Carysfort in the Paulet Affair. Because Kalakaua had been intimidated into giving his power away, this kingdom’s legal code was known as the Bayonet Constitution. Sanford Dole was appointed president of this kingdom shortly before it was annexed by William McKinley in 1898. For ten points, name this kingdom, that was ruled by Queen Liliuokalani and became the 50th US state.',                                                                                                                               
      'In what became known as this city’s "mile," a group of troops including Randall Ramaglia walked through RPG fire to a rally point at National Street. William Garrison commanded troops in a battle in this city that was part of the larger Operation Gothic Serpent; in that battle, troops under Mohammad Farah Aidid shot down two Black Hawk helicopters. For ten points, name this site of a 1993 battle involving Delta Force, the capital of Somalia.',                                                                                                                              
      'This leader’s promotion of pro-feminist policies was noted with the statement "Women hold up half the sky." This man began the Anti-Rightist Campaign after severe criticism led him to undo the Hundred Flowers Movement. In a failed attempt to modernize, this man encouraged peasants to create backyard furnaces during the Great Leap Forward, which began in 1958. For ten points, name this Communist chairman of China.',                                                                                                                            
      'This President’s doctrine pledged support to Middle Eastern governments, including military support for Camille Chamoun of Lebanon. Earl Warren was appointed as Chief Justice by this president a year before Brown v. Board of Education overturned the doctrine of "separate but equal." This president sent members of 101st Airborne Division to escort the Little Rock Nine. For ten points, name this president and former World War II Supreme Allied Commander.',                                                                                                                             
      'Members of this religious movement follow a ruleset called the Ordnung. One of the most conservative sects of this religious group, based in Nebraska, is known for its brown clothing. Some young people from this religious group are allowed to disobey norms in an exploratory period called Rumspringa. Lancaster County, Pennsylvania was a migration site for many members of, for ten points, what religious group known for living without the conveniences of modern technology?',                                                                                                                               
      'In this work, a character recounts the tale of a man named Er who revives on his funeral pyre and shares an account of the afterlife. A character in this work tries to explain the psyche by asking Glaucon to imagine a divided line and imagines a ring that makes the wearer invisible, the Ring of Gyges. The Allegory of the Cave and the bene ts of rule under a \philosopher-king" are described in, for ten points, what Platonic dialogue about justice and forms of government like oligarchy and democracy?',                                                                                                                               
      'This battle was fought concurrently with an engagement at Wavre [wahv], leading to the absence of Emmanuel Grouchy. This battle is commemorated by the Lion’s Mound, where a commander was shot off his horse. The arrival of Gebhard von Blucher’s Prussians helped turn the tide of this battle, which ended the Hundred Days and forced its loser into exile in St. Helena. For ten points, name this 1815 battle in which Wellington defeated Napoleon for the last time.',
      'This man advocated for a “priesthood of all believers” in the work To the Christian Nobility of the German Nation. He was protected by Frederick the Wise after Charles V ordered his arrest. Pope Leo X excommunicated this man with the bull Exsurge Domine [EX-ur-gay DOE-mee-nay] after he posted the 95 Theses. For ten points, name this German priest who began the Protestant Reformation.',
      'This nation was invaded by Huang Taiji in 1636 as the Qing [CHING] dynasty sought to solidify its war against the Ming. In 1592, Toyotomi Hideyoshi’s invasion of this nation was disrupted by enemy turtle ships. The Joseon dynasty ruled it until 1897, and it was annexed by Japan in 1910. For ten points, name this East Asian peninsula split after World War II by Soviet and American agreement into two countries with capitals Pyongyang and Seoul.',
      'This president’s “New Look” policy led to the overthrow of Guatemalan Jacobo Arbenz. This president overhauled the nation’s infrastructure with the National Interstate and Defense Highways Act. For ten points, name this U.S. President who won the 1952 election with the slogan “I like Ike” after leading American troops in Europe in World War II.',
      'Shoshone [sho-sho-nay] Falls and Twin Falls lie on this river, whose largest tributary is the Salmon River. In 1974, Evel Knievel’s Skycycle X-2 nearly jumped a canyon of this tributary of the Columbia River. For ten points, name this river that flows through Hells Canyon after receiving the Boise River near the border of Oregon and Idaho.',
      'The rVSV-ZEBOV vaccine has been shown effective in treating this disease. Emile Ouamouno died six days after contracting this disease, and Eric Duncan infected two Americans with it. Liberia was declared free of this disease after 42 days with no new cases. For ten points, name this disease which caused a 2014 epidemic in West Africa.',
      'In the Hellenistic period, this deity was syncretized with Apis to form the god Serapis. The djed pillar represented the spine of this deity, whose wife searched throughout Egypt to find the 14 pieces of his body after he was torn apart by his jealous brother, Set. For ten points, name this Egyptian god of the afterlife whose consort was his sister, Isis.',
      'Neil Armstrong took a recording of theramin music and this man’s ninth symphony on Apollo 11. He wrote his twelfth string quartet while spending a summer in Spillville, Iowa, though his Slavonic Dances honored Brahms and paid tribute to his native Bohemia. For ten points, name this Czech composer who, while visiting America, wrote his Symphony no. 9, “From the New World.”',
      'One artist from this country classified his work as “stabiles” and “mobiles,” one of which consists of aluminum fins suspended on steel wire. That artist from this country, Alexander Calder, also created Bent Propeller, which was destroyed when the Minoru Yamasaki-designed World Trade Center was attacked on 9/11. For ten points, name this country, home of the Museum of Modern Art in New York.',
      'Supporters of this party were victims of the White Terror Massacre. The Xian [SHEE-ahn] incident was perpetrated by members of this party. The Gang of Four consisted of members of this party and were later found guilty of treason near the end of one of this party’s efforts, the Cultural Revolution. For ten points, name this ruling party of an Asian nation once led by Mao Zedong.',
      'This organization founded the Bowen Country Club as a summer camp. Toynbee Hall inspired this institution, which was founded on Halsted Street by Ellen Gates Starr and the first American woman to win a Nobel Peace Prize. This organization started providing education and support to the poor in 1889. For ten points, name this settlement house in Chicago co-founded by Jane Addams.',
      'This country featured the highest scorer at the inaugural FIFA World Cup, Guillermo Stabile, whose team lost to Uruguay in the finals. Mario Kempes led this country to a 1978 World Cup win as the host nation. In this country’s win over England at the 1986 World Cup, the “Hand of God” scored one goal for Diego Maradona. For ten points, name this country whose soccer team, led by Lionel Messi, placed second in the 2014 World Cup.',
      'Nicholas Reeves has controversially suggested using radar in this location to find hidden rooms. Pierre Lacau supervised a study of this location funded by Lord Carnavon who died of mosquito-borne disease shortly after it was opened. This location, officially designated KV62, was discovered in 1922 by Howard Carter. For ten points, name this surprisingly well-preserved burial site of a boy pharaoh.',
      'The Interahamwe engaged in one of these events after the death of Juvenal Habyarimana. Viktor Yuschenko classified the Holodomor as one of these events, as the Soviets declared the possession of food a crime. Turkey does not recognize one of these events against the Armenian people. For ten points, name these atrocities that involve mass killings of a specific demographic, such as the Holocaust.',
      'Nobukazu Kuriki lost 9 fingers at this location in 2012, and a 1996 disaster here that killed Scott Fischer was chronicled in Jon Krakauer’s Into Thin Air. No one summited this peak in 2015 after an April earthquake killed 19 people at its base camp and Nepal closed it for the season. The guide Tenzing Norgay and Sir Edmund Hillary were the first to climb, for ten points, what tallest mountain in the world?',
      'When asked about violence against followers of this religion, one politician responded, “When a big tree falls, the earth shakes.” An empire named for this religion ruled the Punjab under Maharaja Ranjit Singh during the first half of the 19th century. For ten points, name this monotheistic religion founded by Guru Nanak whose male adherents follow five articles of faith, including the keeping of uncut hair.',
      'This man noted that “Our constitution does not copy the laws of neighboring states” in a speech that offered “comfort [...], not condolence” after the first year of the Archidamian War. He evacuated the farmers of Attica to within the Long Walls, which protected them from Spartan skirmishes but led to the spread of plague that killed him. For ten points, name this statesman of the Athenian Golden Age who opposed Sparta in the early Peloponnesian War.',
      'France briefly held Fort Caroline in what is now this state’s Timucuan Preserve. After the Seven Years’ War, this region was split into east and west sections at the Apalachicola River. The Adams-Onis Treaty ceded this region to the United States, which had been fighting the Seminoles in this territory and nearby Georgia. For ten points, name this once-Spanish territory, now a U.S. state with capital Tallahassee.',
      'This country owns, but is not allowed to navigate, the western wetlands surrounding Lago Merin at the delta of the Yaguaron River. Its western border is a river named for this country; that river combines with the Parana River to form the Rio de la Plata. For ten points, name this country southwest of Brazil whose capital is Montevideo.',
      'Tral stations and the Command-Measurement Complex were used to observe this object. A part of this vehicle was derived from an R7 intercontinental ballistic missile, and it used (+) four radio antennas to broadcast a repeating, pulsing signal. President Eisenhower created ARPA and the government increased funding for (*) science and technology after this object was launched in October 1957. The Soviets started the Space Race with the launch of, for ten points, what first artificial satellite?',
      'This man resigned one position after claiming the media wanted Donovan McNabb to do well because he is black. He offered to purchase aspirin for “all the (+) women at Georgetown University” in response to Congressional testimony on birth control given by Sandra (*) Fluke, who this man called a prostitute in 2012. For ten points, name this conservative commentator whose talk-radio show is the most-listened-to radio program in the United States.',
      'This man served as the defense lawyer for Samuel Houston after he assaulted fellow congressman William Stanbury and later prosecuted the attempted assassin of Andrew Jackson, Richard (+) Laurence. After boarding the HMS Tonnant, he witnessed the bombardment of Fort (*) McHenry and wrote a poem. For ten points, name this man whose Star Spangled Banner became the American national anthem.',
      'One leader of this conflict, Jose Sanjurjo, died in a plane crash after leaving Estoril. The term “Fifth Column” was coined during this war. The Abraham Lincoln Brigade was one of the International Brigades to join this conflict, and (+) Nazi Germany supported one side in this conflict with the Condor Legion. After seizing (*) Cartagena, Republican forces surrendered to the Nationalists. For ten points, name this conflict in an Iberian country that brought Francisco Franco to power.',
      'One mayor of this city, Abraham Beame, asked President Ford for a bailout in 1975. Another mayor of this city drew criticism for limiting the size of (+) sugary soft drinks and for his stop-and-frisk policy, the latter of which (*) Bill de Blasio campaigned against in 2013. Michael Bloomberg was a three-term mayor of, for ten points, what American city in which the police patrol Central Park and Times Square?',
      'In this state, one state senator filibustered this state’s Senate Bill 5, which would have limited access to abortions. That senator, Wendy Davis, lost in the 2014 gubernatorial elections for this state. The (+) presidential campaign of one Senator from this state aroused controversy, as he was born in Canada; that senator is the first (*) Cuban-American to run for the presidency, Ted Cruz. For ten points, name this state whose current Governor, Greg Abbott, succeeded the longest-serving governor in state history, Rick Perry.',
      'This man renounced his original citizenship in 1985 to legally become the owner of an American TV station. He lured Sam Chisholm away from Kerry Packer’s Nine Network to be the CEO of his company, (+) British Sky Broadcasting, and his conglomerate acquired the Wall Street Journal in 2007. His tabloid, (*) News of the World, was shuttered in 2011 after a celebrity phone hacking scandal. For ten points, name this founder of News Corp who, in 2015, stepped down as CEO of 21st Century Fox.',
      'This man destroyed the Vandals after his generals won the battles of Tricamerum and Ad Decimum. The Secret History by Procopius detailed the rule of this emperor and his marriage to a (+) courtesan who convinced him to stay after a riot by the Blues and Greens. This survivor of the Nika Riots formed the (*) Corpus Juris Civilis, later known as his namesake “Code.” For ten points, name this Byzantine emperor who built the Hagia Sophia.',
      'The Marquis of Pombal established the Douro Wine Company in this country. A succession crisis in this country was sparked after the death of (+) Sebastian I at the Battle of the Three Kings. It gained its independence from its eastern neighbor in the Restoration War. The House of (*) Braganza ruled, for ten points, what Iberian country that colonized Brazil?', 
      'This man appointed George Creel to head the Committee on Public Information, a propaganda machine. He attacked those who “poured the poison of disloyalty” in a State of the Union address, but was unable to get a press-censorship clause in the Espionage Act. For ten points, name this President who reneged on a campaign promise to “keep us out of the War” by committing American forces to World War I.',
      'In this novel, a “resurrection man” emerges from the mists in front of a mail coach. John Barsad plants evidence on a man who is a lookalike of a drunken lawyer; that man ends this novel by saying “it is a far, far better rest that I go to than I have ever known” at the guillotine. French nobleman Marquis St. Evremonde is the uncle of Charles Darnay in, for ten points, what novel by Charles Dickens set during the French Revolution?',
      'During this battle, General Howe lost many of his officers, including John Pitcairn. According to legend, someone during this battle gave the order “Don’t shoot until you see the whites of their eyes.” Joseph Warren was killed at, for ten points, what Revolutionary War battle outside Boston that, despite its name, mostly took place on Breed’s Hill?',
      'This person’s life savings were swindled by two men who claimed to have gold from a distant relative. This spy for the Union during the Raid on Combahee Ferry had biographies written by Sarah Hopkins Bradford, which described her navigating a network of tunnels and safehouses. For ten points, name this abolitionist who escorted slaves as they escaped on the Underground Railroad.',
      'This figure was guarded by a group of horsemen called the Celeres, and he may be associated with the war god Quirinus because of his disappearance near the Quirinal Hill. He proclaimed “so perish every one hereafter that will leap over my wall” while killing his brother after they debated the meaning of the number of birds flying around their heads. For ten points, name this brother of Remus, the first king of the Romans.',
      'This man “smelt a rat in Philadelphia” and refused to attend the Constitutional Convention. In one speech, he said “Caesar had his Brutus, Charles his Cromwell” to the House of Burgesses over his opposition to the Stamp Act, and his most famous speech occurred at St. John’s Church in a debate on sending troops during the American Revolution. For ten points, name this American founding father who proclaimed “Give me liberty or give me death!”',
      'The Yaghan people are native to this island chain. Its largest city of Ushuaia [oosh-WHY-uh] was established as a penal colony and is served by the End of the World Train. The Drake Passage lies south of this island chain, and far fewer ships rounded its Cape Horn after the opening of the Panama Canal. For ten points, name this archipelago shared between Chile and Argentina on the southern tip of South America, whose Spanish name translates as “land of fire.”',
      'In 2003, a copy of this painting was covered by a blue curtain while Colin Powell addressed the United Nations. On the left side of this painting, a bull stands over a woman who is holding her dead child. An eye-shaped light bulb explodes in this painting above an impaled, screaming horse. For ten points, name this painting inspired by the bombing of the title Basque town, a massive painting by Pablo Picasso.',
      'This man directed a 2005 film where he played Fred Friendly, a colleague of Edward Murrow, as well as a 2014 film about the recovery of art in Nazi Germany. This director of Good Night and Good Luck and The Monuments Men operates a project to monitor Sudanese war crimes via satellite imagery. For ten points, name this American actor who starred as Daniel Ocean in the Ocean’s 11 trilogy and with Sandra Bullock in 2013’s Gravity.',
      'This ruler attempted to establish the Kingdom of Livonia as a vassal state, and this ruler established his country’s first printing press at Kitai-gorod. This ruler conquered Kazan and Astrakhan, and he established a secret police force known as the Oprichniki. Feodor I succeeded this ruler after he killed his eldest son in a fit of rage, eventually leading to the Time of Troubles. For ten points, name this first Tsar of Russia whose epithet notes his power, not his cruelty.',
      'The price elasticity of this quantity should always be negative, but Veblen goods violate that theory. John Maynard Keynes argued that, in recessions, the aggregate of this quantity should be bolstered by government spending. During the Irish Potato Famine, this quantity rose for potatoes even as their price rose, as people could no longer afford luxuries like meat. For ten points, name this economic quantity that, in competitive markets, should reach equilibrium with supply.',
      'The inefficient Trabant was built in this former country. It used distinctive Ampelm ̈annchen crosswalk symbols that are now enjoyed as its modern residents experience “Ostalgie.” Its residents were once spied on by the Markus Wolf-led Stasi, which revealed its records after reunification in 1990. For ten points, name this former Soviet-zone country with capital Berlin.',
      'During this event, paratroopers captured bridges on the River Orne and Saint-M`ere-Eglise. The First US Army Group participated in Operation Quicksilver prior to this campaign, and was commanded by General Patton. The Canadians were supposed to capture Caen during this operation, and the Americans were assigned to Fortress Cherbourg, part of the Atlantic Wall. For ten points, name this operation, an Allied landing on five beaches in Northern France.',
      'This object was excommunicated by Calixtus III, who believed it boded evil for the defenders of Belgrade. Mark Twain said that this object and he were “two unaccountable freaks” and claimed that he would “go out with it,” a prediction that came true when he died in 1910. The Giotto Probe flew through the coma of this object in 1986, which will be visible again in 2061. For ten points, name this comet that approaches Earth roughly every 76 years.',
      'Kate Altman’s testimony of this event was discredited after one lawyer asked her to repeat her version multiple times. Frances Perkins was sent to investigate this event, for which Max Blanck and Isaac Harris stood trial for locking exit doors from the outside, leading to the deaths of 146 workers. For ten points, name this 1911 disaster in a New York garment factory.',
      'This city’s controversial STRESS program was ended by Mayor Coleman Young. During the 12th Street Riot, Lyndon B. Johnson sent the 101st Airborne to this city, where they provided support for George Romney’s National Guard. Its wealthier suburbs are separated from this city’s poorer areas by 8 Mile Road, and this city’s 1943 Race Riots erupted over tensions caused by high paying automotive jobs. For ten points, name this largest city in Michigan.',
      'This man fought during the Second Baron’s War against Simon de Montfort, who he killed at the Battle of Evesham. This monarch issued the Edict of Expulsion, which expelled all Jews from England. He invaded Scotland, winning the Battle of Falkirk against the forces of William Wallace. For ten points, name this English King given the name “Longshanks” because of his height.',
      'A portion of this structure was built in the contested Ordos region. The early heqin [huh-CHEEN] system allowed the Xiongnu [tchee-ONG-noo] to rule the area north of this structure. The Jiayu Pass serves as the end of one section of this structure built by the Ming dynasty to defend against Mongol attacks. For ten points, name this massive series of Chinese defensive fortifications.',
      'In a letter to John Holmes, Thomas Jefferson commented that this law had “awakened and filled me with terror.” James Tallmadge unsuccessfully proposed that this law make (+) children of slaves free after reaching 25 years old. It was overturned by the (*) Kansas-Nebraska Act and ruled unconstitutional in Dred Scott v. Sanford. For ten points, name this 1820 compromise that banned slavery in certain regions of the Louisiana Purchase, except in a namesake state.',
      'This man was thought to be aboard a plane carrying the Bolivian president in 2013, but he had not left Sheremetyevo Airport since arriving there from Hong Kong. This former employee of (+) Booz Allen Hamilton was attempting to avoid extradition to the U.S. after leaking sensitive (*) documents to Glenn Greenwald. For ten points, name this man who in June 2013 revealed the extent of U.S. government surveillance programs such as PRISM.',
      'James Monroe vouched for this man’s U.S. citizenship, freeing him from French prison. He was sued for libel after writing a response to Edmund Burke’s Reflections on the (+) Revolution in France, and he criticized organized religion and the divinity of the Bible while advocating for the rise of deism in The (*) Age of Reason. The absurdity of an island ruling a continent was observed by, for ten points, what early American revolutionary thinker in his 1776 pamphlet Common Sense?',
      'This adjective names a white supremacist “Council of Citizens” led by Earl Holt. Brent Bozell ghostwrote a book for Arizona Senator Barry Goldwater about The Conscience of this type of person. The Canadian Alliance (+) merged with another party to form the Canadian political party of this name, which was, until October 2015, led by Stephen (*) Harper. Traditional cultural institutions are supported by, for ten points, what political philosophy that describes the American Republican Party, contrasted with “liberalism”?',
      'Livy claims that one participant in this conflict used heated vinegar to cross a blocked mountain pass. Quintus Fabius was nicknamed “the delayer” during this conflict for refusing to engage in battle. One side in this conflict lost at (+) Lake Trasimene [trah-sih-meh-nee] but later won the decisive victory on the plains of Zama under Scipio [SKIP-ee-oh], counteracting a devastating loss at Cannae [CANN-aye]. The (*) Alps were traversed by Hannibal during, for ten points, what second of a series of conflicts between Rome and Carthage?',
      'In one work set in this country, the title character sings “All alba vincero!” or “At dawn, I will win!” In another work set in this country, a woman interrupts a performance of The Red Detachment of Women. The aria (+) “Nessun dorma” is sung by Prince Calaf in this setting of Giacomo Puccini’s (*) Turandot. John Adams composed an opera about a 1972 Presidential visit to, for ten points, what country where Richard Nixon met Mao Zedong?',
      'A second investigation of this event was chaired by Ramsey Clark. The most complete recording of this event was sold to Life Magazine for $150,000 by Abraham (+) Zapruder. John Connally was seriously wounded during this event, which was performed from the sixth floor of the (*) Texas School Book Depository. Jack Ruby killed the perpetrator of this event before he could stand trial. For ten points, name this event in which Lee Harvey Oswald shot the 35th president of the United States.',
      'This city’s empire defeated Ercole d’Este to conquer Commachio and defeated a rival in the War of Chioggia. It was targeted by the League of (+) Cambrai, founded by its nemesis Julius II. Its Arsenale was said to be able to produce one (*) warship a day. A fleet from this city was led by Enrico Dandolo in the Fourth Crusade and sacked Constantinople. For ten points, name this “Most Serene Republic” which was ruled by doges.',
      'According to Tarikh al-Sudan, this empire’s last ruler was Mahmud IV, whose defeat at the Battle of Djenne caused its collapse. The ton-tigi, or “quiver-masters,” advised this empire’s rulers at its (+) Gbara legislature. Its constitution, the Kouroukan Fouga, was established after its first ruler won the Battle of Kirina. This empire’s most famous ruler (*) caused inflation by spending tons of gold on his way to Mecca. For ten points, name this West African empire led by Sundieta Keita and Mansa Musa.',
      'The aftermath of this event led to the creation of the Quadruple Alliance and the formation of the 38 state German Confederation. It restored the Bourbon Dynasty in France with Louis XVIII. This meeting was interrupted by the Hundred Days and it was headed by Austrian minister Klemens von Metternich. For ten points, name this 1815 meeting that sought to organize post-Napoleonic Europe.',
      'This document calls one leader a “dread sovereign” and advocates to “combine ourselves together in a civil body politic.” It was dated using the Julian Calendar instead of the Gregorian Calendar, and it was recorded in a journal by William Bradford. For ten points, name this 1620 agreement signed by the pilgrims who founded Plymouth Colony.',
      'In 2012, this man announced a “Return to Sovereignty” day. This man, who accused the show Asa Zuba! of slander, leads a coalition between the NKP and his Liberal Democrats. He recently updated the “three-arrows” of his namesake economics but has been criticized for numerous visits to the Yasukuni Shrine. For ten points, name this current Prime Minster of Japan.',
      'This man received one appointment originally intended for Frederick Funston. Edward House prevented the official reprimand of this man for protesting a potential armistice to Supreme Allied Council. He was the first American to be promoted to General of the Armies during his lifetime, due to his service commanding the American Expeditionary Force in World War I. For ten points, name this American general, nicknamed “Black Jack.”',
      'A poem about this river notes that “Wushan’s clouds and rain” will be held back by “walls of stone.” Those walls predicted a dam, completed in 2012, that now blocks silt from traveling downstream, potentially weakening Shanghai on its mouth. The Three Gorges Dam was built on, for ten points, what longest river in Asia?',
      'Marc Dubois suffered from this condition as the pilot of Air France Flight 447, which crashed in 2009. World records for this condition are no longer maintained due to fear of harm, but the last scientifically documented record for this condition is Randy Gardner’s 264 hours. Tracy Morgan was injured in a bus accident caused by a Walmart truck driver suffering from this condition. For ten points, name this condition that causes irritability and yawning.',
      'Theodore Parker and Gerrit Smith were part of the Secret Six that funded this man’s actions. The Fugitive Slave Act prompted this man to create The League of the Gileadites. His son was killed by the forces of John Reid in Osawatomie. The Sack of Lawrence prompted this man to participate in the Pottawatomie Massacre. Robert E. Lee stopped this man from attempting to overtake a federal armory in West Virginia. For ten points, name this abolitionist who led an 1859 raid on Harper’s Ferry.',
      'This woman defeated the Emirate of Granada, ending the Reconquista period of her country. She sponsored the trips of an explorer from Genoa who started Spanish colonization of the New World. For ten points, name this Castilian queen who married Ferdinand II of Aragon and sponsored the trips of Christopher Columbus.',
      'This man gave the Appeal of 18 June Speech during one war. This leader’s opposition to the European Commission led to the Empty Chair Crisis. He was later criticized after Expo 67 for proclaiming “Long live free Quebec!” This man’s government ended a conflict with the FLN by signing the Evian Accords. He was brought to power in the May Crisis, leading to the formation of the Fifth Republic. For ten points, name this French Prime Minister who led the Free French Forces during WWII.',
      'Xerxes the Great built a throne hall with one hundred of these features in Persepolis. The term entasis refers to the gradual decrease in these objects’ diameter as they rise, removing the optical illusion that these objects bend inward. One style of these objects uses a scroll for the capital; in addition to that Ionic type, these objects come in Doric and Corinthian orders. For ten points, name these architectural elements which usually bear the weight of a roof or ceiling.',
      'During a drunken brawl, this man killed his officer Cleitus the Black, who had earlier saved this man’s life during the Battle of the Granicus River. This man’s successors were known as the Diadochi , and this rider of Bucephalus defeated Darius III at the Battle of Gaugamela. For ten points, name this son of Phillip II, a king of Macedon who conquered Persia.',
      'During the Battle of this location, Bernard Coy was able to sneak into its armory and secure a Springfield rifle. Robert Franklin Stroud was labeled its Birdman, and a group led by Frank Morris are presumed to have drowned after escaping this location in San Francisco Bay. For ten points, name this notorious island prison.',
      'In 2000, Robert Fowler reported how the trade of these objects violated the Lusaka Protocol. The Kimberley Process ensures that these objects are “conflict-free.” The Revolutionary United Front in Sierra Leone used child soldiers to gather these objects. These objects are sold by the Cecil Rhodes-founded company De Beers. For ten points, name these precious gems that are often nicknamed “blood” when used to finance warlords.',
      'In 2008, FiveThirtyEight.com only failed to predict this state’s Presidential result. Robert Kennedy’s speech after the death of Martin Luther King was given in this state, shortly after speeches that day at Ball State and Notre Dame universities here. In 2015, the review website Angie’s List cancelled a planned expansion of its headquarters in this state after the Religious Freedom Restoration Act was passed and signed by its governor, Mike Pence. For ten points, name this “Hoosier” state.',
      'Alcuin of York’s letters lament these people’s sacking of a priory on the Northumbrian island of Lindisfarne. The Great Heathen Army legendarily avenged the death of one of their leaders, Ragnar Lodbrok. Leif Erikson founded their colony of Vinland in the New World. For ten points, name these Scandinavian sea-faring raiders whose longships dominated medieval Europe for four centuries.',
      'A “tattered man” in this novel bothers the protagonist, who is given a yellow envelope to deliver to Wilson’s family upon his death, though Wilson asks for it back. In this novel, Henry Fleming is hit in the head with a rifle, leading his fellow soldiers to think he suffered the title wound. For ten points, name this Civil War novel written by Stephen Crane.',
      'One of these people is the title character of an opera which was revised to add a “Polish act” and ends with the Holy Fool lamenting his country’s fate in Kromy Forest. In another opera, Ivan Susanin sacrifices himself for this title leader. The lead-up to the Time of Troubles was chronicled in Modest Mussorgsky’s opera about one of these monarchs, Boris Godunov. For ten points, Mikhail Glinka wrote an opera about A Life For what leaders of the Russian Empire?',
      'The “liquidators” dealt with the aftermath of this event, which was detected after a day in Forsmark, Sweden. The Red Forest was created by this event, which led to a “zone of alienation” being marked around the city of Pripyat. It was triggered by a poorly-safeguarded experiment in which control rods were manually removed, spreading radiation over much of Europe. For ten points, name this 1986 nuclear meltdown in modern Ukraine.',
      'This man described the arrival of the first African slaves into his home colony in a letter to Edwin Sandys. This man, who traveled with his family back to England on the ship (+) Treasurer, created the Varina Farms plantation and married a woman christened (*) Rebecca after her conversion to Christianity. For ten points, name this early American settler who developed tobacco as a cash crop in Virginia and married Pocahontas.',
      'Some of this company’s Turbocharged Direct Injection, or TDI, engines controversially did not require the use of AdBlue urea solution to control the production of (+) nitrogen oxides. In September 2015, this company’s use of “defeat device” software was revealed when the EPA charged this company with (*) cheating on emission testing with hundreds of thousands of its diesel-powered cars. For ten points, name this German automaker of the Golf, Jetta, and Beetle, whose name loosely translates to “People’s Car.”',
      'In 1855, Napoleon III commissioned a classification system for this commodity, produced by Haut-Brion and Chateau Margaux. Prominent (+) growing regions for this product include France’s “golden slope,” though the 1976 Judgment of Paris proved the quality of (*) California’s production of varieties like Cabernet Sauvignon. For ten points, name this alcoholic beverage produced in Burgundy and Bordeaux from grapes.',
      'Foreigners such as the Scotsman Thomas Gordon were often invited to lead this organization. One portion of this organization nearly sparked (+) war with Great Britain while being deployed to relieve another part of this organization, which had been bottled up in Port Arthur. That force would proceed to have its T crossed by (*) Heihachiro Togo and be destroyed at the Battle of Tsushima Straits. The Baltic and Pacific fleets were part of, for ten points, what military organization, which experienced a revolt on the battleship Potemkin?',
      'Mediation in this agreement was performed by Cyrus Vance. This agreement affirmed the importance of UN Security Council Resolution 242. (+) Tensions rose after its signing due to assumption of King Hussein’s willingness to agree to its terms. It led to a framework for the eventual return of the Sinai Peninsula. (*) Menachem Begin and Anwar Sadat shared the 1978 Nobel Peace Prize shortly after signing, for ten points, what agreement between Israel and Egypt guided by Jimmy Carter at a presidential retreat?',
      'A parrot rests on a sign in one work by this artist, in which a cat, an ox, a rabbit, and an elk represent the Four Humors. A demon under a rainbow holds a sign bearing the title of this artist’s (+) Melencolia I. This artist incorrectly added a horn to his depiction of an animal that had been given to Lisbon by Indian diplomats in 1515, and showed (*) Famine, War, Plague, and Death trampling peasants in another work. For ten points, name this German creator of woodcuts like the Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse and Rhinoceros.',
      'This man threatened to kill Dennis Wilson, a Beach Boy, for changing the lyrics to his song “Cease to Exist.” Vincent Bugliosi used circumstantial evidence to convict this man of conspiracy to (+) murder. He predicted a chaotic white vs. black war triggered by his music and that of the (*) Beatles; this man called that conflict Helter Skelter. For ten points, name this man who, in 1969, ordered Sharon Tate and eight other people to be murdered by his so-called “Family.”',
      'Thomas Percy and Charles Neville attempted to overthrow this monarch in the Rising of the North. This monarch supported the Dutch in one conflict by signing the Treaty of Nonsuch, and Francis Walsingham uncovered a plot to assassinate this monarch by Anthony (+) Babington, which led to the execution of this monarch’s cousin, Mary Stuart. This monarch spoke of having a “heart and stomach of a (*) king” in a speech to troops at Tilbury. The Spanish Armada targeted, for ten points, what “Virgin Queen” of England?',
      'Artist George Catlin specialized in portraiture of these people. J.P. Morgan funded Edward Curtis’ project to photographically document the lives of these people. Korczak Ziolkowski began sculpting a (+) monument to one of these people in 1948; that unfinished monument is less than twenty miles from Mount Rushmore on the (*) sacred Thunderhead Mountain. For ten points, name these people, including Crazy Horse, a member of the Oglala Sioux.',
      'This thinker’s work The Sand Reckoner is the most comprehensive surviving source for Aristarchus’ heliocentric theory. He was the first to develop formulas for the volume and surface area of a sphere and invented a namesake “screw” used for raising water, but his “death ray” did not actually sink a fleet attacking his home, Syracuse. For ten points, name this scientist who supposedly ran through the streets shouting “Eureka!” after discovering the principle of buoyancy.',
      'Prior to this event, the owner of Green Springs Plantation had tried to acquire warriors from the Pamunkey queen Cockacoeske. Joseph Ingram failed to rally this movement after its leader died of dysentery. It grew from fear of Native American attacks and ended with the hangings of 23 rebels. For ten points, name this 1676 rebellion against Virginia Governor William Berkeley in which Jamestown was burned to the ground.',
      'In this battle, an I-168 sank the USS Hammann, which was picking up survivors from a ship captained by Elliot Buckmaster; that ship lagged behind the Enterprise and Hornet. The USS Yorktown was lost, but four Japanese carriers were destroyed in, for ten points, what decisive American victory, the turning point of the Pacific theater of World War II?',
      'This scientist beat Emile Berliner to the patent of the carbon transmitter and is attributed with creating the world’s first industrial research and development lab, found in West Orange, New Jersey. The quote “genius is 1 percent inspiration and 99 percent perspiration” is attributed to this Wizard of Menlo Park. For ten points, name this prolific inventor of the phonograph, movie camera, and incandescent light bulb.',
      'Michael Servetus believed that the soul could be found in this body system and was the first to correctly describe its function in the lungs. Marcello Malpighi confirmed a hypothesis about this system made by a 17th century English physician about how two major components were connected. Robert Jarvik developed a replacement for the major organ of this system, which was studied by Galen and William Harvey. For ten points, name this body system consisting of the heart, blood, and blood vessels.',
      'This organization controlled the Saarland for 15 years before a referendum supported German rule. It did nothing in response to the Mukden incident, after which Japan withdrew from this organization. The U.S. Senate’s refusal to sign the Treaty of Versailles meant that the U.S. never joined this organization. For ten points, name this international body that was unable to prevent World War II and was replaced by the United Nations.',
      'This composer popularized a percussion-heavy style music inspired by Janissary bands with an opera in which Belmonte rescues Konstanze from Pasha Selim’s harem. He included heavy Masonic symbolism in an opera in which Tamino overcomes a series of trials with the help of the title woodwind. For ten points, name this composer of The Abduction From The Seraglio and The Magic Flute.',
      'One of these objects was taken by Vladimir Putin from Robert Kraft, who has earned four of them as an owner. The 1972 design symbolically includes 17 diamonds, and their designs often include gems and diamonds in the shapes of Roman numerals and the Vince Lombardi trophy. Tom Brady of the New England Patriots has four of, for ten points, what type of personal jewelry given to players and staff of teams who win the NFL championship?',
      'One play depicting this event shows Giles Corey being executed with stones. Thomas Danforth and John Hathorne were heavily involved in this event, which was caused by the fits of Abigail Williams and Betty Parris, who were supposedly under the spell of slave Tituba. The Crucible depicted, for ten points, what 1690s event in which a Massachusetts town executed people for supposedly practicing magic?',
      'This family’s crest pictures a red cow eating grass against a yellow background. One member of this family hosted an orgy in the Banquet of the Chestnuts. That man, the enemy of Girolamo Savonarola, had formed the League of Venice to oppose Charles VIII’s invasion of Italy. That man’s son had embarked on the Romagna campaign, and was the inspiration for Niccolo Machiavelli’s The Prince. For ten points, name this Italian family whose members included Cesare and Pope Alexander VI.',
      'A 1948 expiration date was set for a mandate for this region and a corresponding memorandum regarding Transjordan established by the League of Nations. Since the 1993 Oslo Accords, parts of this region have been governed by a namesake National Authority currently led by Mahmoud Abbas. For ten points, name this Middle Eastern region, home to a state that competes over claims on the West Bank and Gaza Strip, as well as a potential “two-state” solution, with Israel.',
      'The neighborhood of Marble Hill was separated from this island by the construction of a canal in 1895. Its original source of fresh water, Collect Pond, was landfilled and became the site of the Five Points slum. This island’s neighborhood of Battery Park City was built from land excavated from a Minoru Yamasaki-designed skyscraper project, and a low-lying area in the north of this island became a center of African-American culture. For ten points, what island in New York City is home to Harlem and the World Trade Center?',
      'The patronage of Gushi Khan increased the power of the holders of this position. A delegate of one holder of this position was forced at gunpoint to ratify the Seventeen Point Agreement. Men who hold this position are thought to be incarnations of Avalokiteshvara. The current holder of this position, Tenzin Gyatso, currently lives in exile in India. For ten points, name this position, the spiritual leader of Tibetan Buddhism.',
      'This position was ended by the Peace of Pressburg, which also created the Confederation of the Rhine. One holder of this position stood in the snow outside Canossa to do penance, and the successor to this position was decided by the prince-electors. These men were crowned by popes until 1530, and the phrase “sacrum” was added to this title by a man who fought the Lombard League. For ten points, name this position, which was held by Charles V and Frederick Barbarossa.',
      'At least two governors of this state have publicly refused to return a Virginian Confederate flag won at the Battle of Gettysburg. One, the current governor, endured a state government shutdown in 2011; the other was former professional wrestler Jesse Ventura. For ten points, name this state where Mark Dayton of the Democratic-Farmer-Labor Party governs from St. Paul.',
      'This company’s John Archbold was almost assassinated in 1915 at Cedar Cliffs by members of the IWW. One of this company’s founders, Henry Flagler, is the namesake of the Florida east coast Railway. Muckraker Ida Tarbell wrote a history of this company, which was dissolved after it was found to be violating the Sherman Antitrust Act in 1911. For ten points, name this petroleum company that was created by John D. Rockefeller.',
      'This man documents his experiences traveling in China in his collection “In Time of War: A Sonnet Sequence with a Verse Commentary.” One poem by this author asks “Who can reach the deaf?/Who can speak for the dumb?” and begins in “one of the dives/On Fifty-Second Street”; that poem declares “We must love each other or die.” “Funeral Blues” was written by, for ten points, what poet who memorialized the beginning of WWII in his poem “September 1, 1939?”',
      'The Senussi opposed French influence on this continent in the early 20th century. The Battle of Gazala was fought near a northern port on this continent, Tobruk, during the Western Desert Campaign; that campaign culminated in the Second Battle of El Alamein, where Erwin Rommel’s forces were forced to retreat to this continent’s northernmost country, Tunisia. For ten points, name this continent where an Allied World War 2 campaign pushed the Germans out of Libyan and Egyptian deserts.',
      'One man involved in this event used the name John Johnson, and people involved in this event took shelter at the Holbeche House. Francis (+) Tresham and Thomas Wintour were executed for their role in this event, and the plan for this event was uncovered in an anonymous letter sent to Lord (*) Monteagle. Robert Catesby served as the leader behind this event, which saw Guy Fawkes discovered guarding ammunition. For ten points, name this plot to blow up the British Parliament and assassinate James I.',
      'A radiator of this color can be seen in the lower left Edward Hopper’s Automat, and a flag of this color flies atop of the mast of Bosch’s Ship of Fools. Gauguin painted a symbolic (+) Christ of this color, which joins black, red, and blue as the only colors in most (*) Piet Mondrian works. For ten points, name this primary color featured in Van Gogh’s Sunflowers.',
      'This man took riverboats from Cairo, Illinois across the Mississippi river in his first battle as commanding officer, the Battle of Belmont. He caused Nathan (+) Bedford Forrest to flee Fort Donelson, where he demanded Simon Buckner’s immediate surrender. His troops defended the (*) Hornet’s Nest at a battle where Albert Sidney Johnston was killed. For ten points, name this victorious general at the Battle of Shiloh who earned the nickname “Unconditional Surrender,” partially for his initials.',
      'TANAPA manages this mountain’s Lemosho trail. First summited by Hans Meyer, it consists three connected cones: Shira, Mawenzi, and one renamed by (+) Julius Nyerere to celebrate his nation’s independence, Kibo. This mountain’s Arrow Glacier doesn’t exist anymore, and all the ice on (*) its Uhuru Peak is expected to disappear by 2060. For ten points, what dormant, snow-capped volcano in Tanzania is the highest point in Africa?',
      'According to William of Poitiers, Pope Alexander II gave a papal banner to one leader prior to this battle. That leader led an attacking force landed in Pevensey, even though they intended to land in the (+) Isle of Wight. The other side in this battle had a defensive position on Senlac Hill, where one losing leader was shot in the (*) eye. This battle is depicted on the Bayeux Tapestry, which shows the death of Harold Godwinson. For ten points, name this 1066 victory for William the Conqueror, who afterward would establish Norman rule of England.',
      'This god turned Caenis into a man so that she could become a warrior, and this god was angered when (+) Laomedon refused to pay him for building the walls of Troy. This god was defeated by (*) Athena in a contest for the patronage of Athens when her gift of the olive tree was judged superior to his gift of a saltwater spring. For ten points, name this Greek trident-wielding god of the sea.',
      'One of this man’s first acts as Prime Minister was the First Agrarian Reform, which expropriated large sugar plantations for redistributions to peasants. Before coming to power, he was denied counsel in a trial over a failed (+) July 26th attack on the barracks at Moncada; at that trial, this man proclaimed “Condemn me; it does not matter. History will (*) absolve me.” After overthrowing Fulgencio Batista, this man ruled for half a century until passing power to his brother Raul in 2008. For ten points, name this longtime dictator of Cuba.',
      'Ben Shahn created a painting depicting these people in coffins titled for their Passion. Mario Buda probably assisted in the Wall Street (+) bombing two days after the indictment of these men, who were defended by Fred Moore for the (*) murder of Alessandro Berardelli during a Massachusetts robbery in 1920. For ten points, name these two Italian anarchists whose death sentences were criticized worldwide as being politically motivated.',
      'In response to this event, Mossad launched Operation Wraith of God and Operation Spring of Youth. This event’s perpetrators demanded the release of Andreas Baader and (+) Ulrike Meinhoff, the founders of the Red Army Faction, and it was codenamed Operation Iqrit and Biram after villages depopulated by the (*) Haganah. For ten points, name this event that saw members of Black September kill 11 Israeli coaches and athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympics in a certain German city.',
      'This country took five boats from a French port in the Cherbourg Project; France had refused to deliver the boats, for which this country had paid, when diplomatic relations broke after the Six-Day War. Operation Wrath of God was launched after 11 members of this country’s Olympic team were killed in 1972. For the point, name this Middle Eastern country that carried out those missions via Mossad, an intelligence agency that reports to Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu.',
      'This location became inhabited after the Battle of White Marsh. A legend about this location relates how Isaac Potts encountered a general praying in the snow. Flour and water was mixed to form “firecake” at this site, where a Blue Book was produced after the arrival of Baron von Steuben, who taught military drill to its inhabitants. For the point, name this Pennsylvania site where the Continental Army endured the winter of 1777.',
      'The “Six Philosophies” of this modern country’s classical philosophy can be broadly categorized into schools referred to as “there exists” and “there doesn’t exist.” Sources of knowledge in this country’s philosophy are known as pramanas. The grammarian Panini worked in this modern-day country, whose Upanishads greatly influenced the work of Arthur Schopenhauer. For the point, name this modern country whose non-violent philosophies include ahimsa and Mahatma Gandhi’s satyagraha.',
      'A form of this activity called joiking is performed by the Sami people and was banned during their Christianization. Another form of this activity, kulning, developed in Scandinavia for use with livestock due to its ability to travel long distances. Tremolo is common in another form of this activity common in the Alps, where it can travel via echoes. Yodeling is a form of, for the point, what musical activity?',
      'This artist painted a group of school children looking at a bust of Lenin in Russian Schoolroom. In another painting by this artist, a tomato is splattered against the wall while four U.S. Marshals escort Ruby Bridges to a desegregated school. This artist of The Problem We All Live With depicted a woman serving a turkey dinner to her family. For the point, name this artist of the Four Freedom series, who designed many covers for the Saturday Evening Post.',
      'A 1974 coup d’etat in this country led to the downfall of another country’s Regime of the Colonels. The guerilla group EOKA in this country was led by its first President, Makarios III, and by Georgios Grivas, an advocate of the enosis policy that would unite this country with Greece. For the point, name this Mediterranean island country where a buffer zone divides Turkish and Greek-controlled territory and a Green Line runs through its capital, Nicosia.',
      'The second section of Lytton Strachey’s Eminent Victorians claims that a person involved in this conflict was possessed by a demon while working at Scutari. A poem set in this war begins “Half a league, half a league, / Half a league onward, / All in the valley of Death / Rode the six hundred.” Florence Nightingale served as a nurse during, for the point, what war that provides the setting for Alfred Tennyson’s poem “The Charge of the Light Brigade”?',
      ' In 1829, this commodity caused a “Great Intrusion” into modern-day Lumpkin County near Dahlonega , Georgia. Jim Fisk and Jay Gould’s attempt to corner this commodity’s market caused a Black Friday in 1869. Two years before the Battle of Little Bighorn, General George Custer led forces into South Dakota to search for, for the point, what precious metal whose discovery at Sutter’s Mill triggered a namesake “rush” to California in 1848?',
      'This event spurred the creation of a show hosted by Frank Reynolds, ABC’s Nightline. Cyrus Vance resigned during this event after disagreements over a botched helicopter rescue mission, Operation Eagle Claw. Canadian Ambassador Ken Taylor sheltered six people who escaped this event by posing as a film crew. This event ended on the day of Ronald Reagan’s inauguration. For the point, name this event in which American citizens were held for 444 days in Tehran.',
      'This phrase names a terrorist “Faction” led by Baader and Meinhof in West Germany. Zhu De led a force of this name that was labeled for “Workers and Peasants” until after World War II; that force fought five counter-encirclement campaigns against Chiang Kai-shek’s Nationalists. The arrival of another force of this name in Berlin forced Hitler to commit suicide. For the point, give this colorful term for land-based military forces in Bolshevik Russia and Communist China.',
      'The terms ratified during this event had earlier been tabled in the Treaty of Chaumont. The Earl of Clancarty was sent to this event after military hostilities broke out during it. This conference, which attempted to restore monarchs to their pre-war thrones, was interrupted by the Hundred Days when a French emperor returned to power. Klemens von Metternich chaired, for the point, what 1814 “Congress” to restore order after the Napoleonic Wars, held in Austria?',
      'George Tucker wrote an 1836 biography of this man, who had earlier asked Tucker to serve as a Moral Philosophy professor. This man won a presidential election after a compromise secured James Bayard’s decisive electoral college vote. This man obtained an over 45 percent margin in the popular vote in the first post-12th Amendment presidential election. The first president from the Democratic-Republican party was, for the point, what man who first won the presidency in 1800 over incumbent John Adams?',
      'This composer set a description of Solomon’s anointing for an anthem that has been played at the coronation of every British monarch since George II. This composer of Zadok The Priest included the chorus “See the conqu’ring hero comes” in his oratorio Judas Maccabaeus. King George II supposedly began the tradition of standing during another work of this composer. For the point, name this German-born composer who included the “Hallelujah Chorus” in his Messiah.',
      'This region’s development grew under the Dalstroy construction trust, which operated slave labor for the NKVD. In this region, the port city of Magadan developed to ship mined materials from the Kolyma Gulag. A railroad named for this region once required a ferry to cross Lake Baikal and now spans the distance from Moscow to Vladivostok. For the point, name this eastern region of Russia where Stalin operated many prisons in isolated, cold conditions.',
      'Prior to the start of this war, John Slidell was authorized to offer 25 million dollars to resolve a boundary dispute before negotiations broke down. Abraham Lincoln authored the “Spot Resolutions” questioning whether a skirmish prior to this war was on American soil. The US Navy’s blockade of Veracruz was crucial in this war, which featured the last military campaign of Santa Anna. For the point, name this 1840s war in which the United States fought its southern neighbor.',
      'An army led by this man defeated forces under David Leslie at the Battle of Dunbar, after which he captured the city of Edinburgh. This man’s power was affirmed by John Lambert’s Instrument of Government shortly after this man had created and then dissolved Barebone’s Parliament. This man ruled over the Protectorate after his faction, the Roundheads, defeated the faction of Charles I in the English Civil War. For the point, name this Puritan leader and Lord Protector of England.',
      'In 1971, the Supreme Court unanimously overturned this man’s conviction for refusing to join the Army; in his refusal, this man cited his Muslim beliefs and the fact that he “ain’t got no quarrel with them Viet Cong.” This man opposed George Foreman in the 1974 “Rumble in the Jungle,” knocking him out in the 8th round. For the point, name this boxer, born Cassius Clay, who was known as “the Greatest” and died in 2016 after a lengthy battle with Parkinson’s. ',
      'In 1999, this country’s soldiers attempted to infiltrate the Line of Control, sparking the Kargil War. Former leaders of this country include Yahya Khan, who launched Operation Searchlight to counter the Awami League, and Benazir Bhutto, the first democratic female leader of a Muslim nation. Muhammad Ali Jinnah founded, for the point, what country whose “East” portion is now Bangladesh and which contests Kashmir with its neighbor, India?',
      'This President declared “I don’t care about my dignity” after engaging in a war of words with demonstrators in Cleveland; that came during a series of speeches dubbed the “Swing Around the Circle.” This President was accused of violating the Tenure of Office Act when he dismissed his Secretary of War Edwin Stanton, but the Senate narrowly voted to acquit him of the impeachment charges. For the point, name this successor of Abraham Lincoln.',
      'This figure agreed to give a rare interview with Martin Bashir that was first broadcast in November 1995. Pictures of this person wearing a helmet and flak jacket in Angola helped raise awareness of landmine removal efforts. This person was killed alongside driver Henri Paul and Dodi Fayed in a car crash in a Parisian tunnel a year after her highly publicized divorce from Prince Charles. For the point, name this royal activist, the mother of British princes William and Harry.',
      'The signing of this agreement fulfilled the Durban Platform, which called for Indian and Chinese involvement and action by the year 2020. Nicaragua, noting that the principle of voluntary national commitment did not do enough, refused to join this agreement, which was weakened in June 2017 when Donald Trump declared that the US would leave it. For the point, name this 2016 multinational agreement to reduce carbon emissions that was signed in France.',
      'This event prompted Pope John XXIII to urge governments “not to remain deaf to this cry of humanity.” During this event, the submarine B-59 refused to open fire, after which Vasili Arkhipov became known as the “man who saved the world.” In the aftermath of this event, Jupiter systems were removed from Turkey and a hotline was established to improve communications between Moscow and Washington. For the point, name this October 1962 event in which Nikita Khrushchev attempted to place missiles in the Caribbean.',
      'An early success for this cause was Neal Dow’s passing of the “Maine Law,” though that was eventually overturned by a riot in Portland. This cause, which the WCTU’s Carrie Nation helped enforce with an axe, was circumvented by the establishment of “speakeasies.” The 1920 Volstead Act was the ultimate success for this cause, but was overturned in 1933 by the 21st Amendment. For the point, name this social cause that seeks to ban intoxicating liquors.',
      'Henry Flagler’s Overseas Railroad targeted this island chain and operated until 1935. A farcical “Conch Republic” was set up in this island chain by Dennis Wardlow in 1982 to protest a series of roadblocks. PanAm was founded in 1927 to fly airmail from one island in this chain to Havana. The Seven Mile Bridge can be found in these islands, whose largest island is named Largo. For the point, name this island chain off the southern coast of Florida.',
      'This man’s fleet was commanded by Marcus Agrippa, who became his son-in-law. After a major defeat at Teutoburg Forest, this man shouted “Varus, give me back my legions!” and set the boundaries of his empire at the Rhine. This man owned Egypt following his victory at the Battle of Actium and the deaths of Cleopatra and this man’s rival, Mark Antony. This man was given the title princeps by the Senate in 27 BC. For the point, name this first Emperor of Rome.',
      'In 1738 in this city’s Aldersgate ward, an intense religious experience at a Moravian church sparked a new denomination. General William Booth founded the Salvation Army in this city, where its headquarters remain. The first Methodist conference was held under John Wesley’s leadership in this city, where a statue of Wesley stands in the churchyard of a cathedral rebuilt by Christopher Wren. For the point, name this city where St. Paul’s Cathedral hosts Anglican services.',
      'This location partially titles a memoir that usually goes by the shortened name Mourt’s Relation, which was written by Edward Winslow. A plantation in this location names a book about a group of colonists governed for thirty years by William Bradford, its author. Each of those works describe the traditional “first Thanksgiving,” which took place in this location in 1621. For the point, name this New England where the Purtians of the Mayflower settled near a namesake rock.',
      'Thousands of people were injured or killed in a stampede during this ruler’s coronation feast at Khodynka Field, helping earn him the epithet “Bloody.” This ruler issued the October Manifesto, establishing the first state Duma, after the 1905 Revolution. Numerous losses in both the Russo-Japanese War and World War I led this ruler to abdicate in favor of his brother Michael. For the point, name this Romanov ruler, the last Russian tsar, who was killed with his family in 1918.',
      'The question of whether a circle and one of these shapes with the same area can be constructed with a compass and straight-edge was proven impossible in 1882. Euclid proved that the diagonal of one of these shapes is irrational and equal to their side length times two to the one-half power. Ben Franklin popularized “magic” arrays of numbers in this shape. For the point, name these shapes whose four sides all have the same length.',
      'This dynasty is honored on the Mansu Hill Grand Monument, which depicts Mount Paektu. The founder of this dynasty outlined the concept of Juche       and created a cult of personality. A member of this family was arrested attempting to visit Disneyland in Japan; that member was assassinated in Kuala Lumpur’s airport in 2016. For the point, name this ruling family of North Korea that includes Il-sung, Jong-il, and Jong-un.',
      'Leo the Isaurian ended the first of this empire’s Iconoclasms. Embellished or fake political scandals in this empire were detailed in Procopius’ Secret History. The Sassanians and this empire established the Eternal Peace, and its expansion was checked by the Seljuks at Manzikert. The Fourth Crusade was diverted and instead sacked the capital of, for the point, what empire that was once ruled by Justinian the Great from Constantinople?',
     'This city’s CRASH anti-gang unit was the subject of the Rampart police corruption scandal in the late-1990s. Sixteen people died in this city’s Northridge Meadows Apartments on Reseda Boulevard in a 1994 earthquake. Rebel Without a Cause was set in this city, filming at its Griffith Observatory. Sid Grauman built a “Chinese Theater” and an “Egyptian Theater” in this city. Brentwood and Bel-Air are neighborhoods of, for the point, what most populous city of California?',
     'This man led a squadron of ships past a blockade of Presque Isle Bay to sail to Put-in-Bay. In one battle, this man transferred his command from the Lawrence to the Niagara when his first flagship was destroyed. After defeating a British fleet in an engagement during the War of 1812, this man declared “We have met the enemy and they are ours.” For the point, name this victor of the Battle of Lake Erie.',
     'In 1939, invading Japanese troops devised the never-enacted Otani plan for this project. John L. Savage surveyed for this project, whose construction drove the baiji dolphin to extinction and displaced 1.3 million people near Chongqing. The Itaipu Dam was surpassed in power output after the completion of, for the point, what massive hydroelectric dam on the Yangtze River, the largest in the world?',
     'The provisions of this document were reaffirmed by the Resolutions of Edward Coke. The standard edition of this document was compiled in the 18th Century by William Blackstone. This document, which was signed by Robert Fitzwalter, failed in preventing the outbreak of the First Barons’ War. For the point, name this 1215 document providing liberties to the English people that was signed at Runnymede by a group of nobles and King John.',
     'In one work, two princes from this country beat their wives after they are humiliated for being afraid of a lion. In another epic poem, this modern country is home to Marsile, king of the Saracens, who schemes with Ganelon to ambush their enemy as they head home through Roncevaux Pass. The Song of Roland depicts Charlemagne’s war in, for the point, what modern European country where the Moors also fought againstElCid?',
     'In this state, George Pullman founded the model company town of Pullman; an 1894 strike began in that town, after which Governor John Peter Altgeld controversially opposed the presence of federal troops in this state. In 1887, Albert Parsons was one of four labor leaders to be executed in this state for their role in inciting a riot in which a bomb was thrown at a group of police officers. For the point, name this state where the Haymarket Affair rocked the city of Chicago.',
     'One side in this battle was supplied by a road from Bar-le-Duc called the “Sacred Way.” Erich von Falkenhayn was dismissed after his failure to defeat Robert Nivelle in this battle, where Nivelle’s declaration that “they shall not pass” proved more correct than Falkenhayn’s prediction that the French would “bleed” themselves “white.” Philippe Petain became a national hero for his role in, for the point, what 1916 battle in Northeastern France, the longest of World War I’s western front?',
     'The accuracy of these devices was greatly improved by George Graham’s use of a deadbeat escapement. Modern examples of these devices often rely on the transition between spin energy levels of cesium atoms. Christiaan Huygens       invented the pendulum variety of these devices in 1656, and earlier examples include a water-operated one invented by Plato and shadow-operated ones, such as sundials. For the point, name these timekeeping devices.',
     'A subset of this political party based in Essex County advocated secession from the United States. Charles Pinckney lost two Presidential elections as this party’s candidate, and it faded after the Hartford Convention. This party was the opposition for the end of the First Party System, and only elected one President, John Adams. For the point, name this early American political party, supported by Alexander Hamilton, that opposed the Democratic-Republicans.',
     'One man with this occupation may have been opposed by a man named Heinz Thorvald or Erwin Konig, though historians cannot verify the story. Another person with this occupation lost his left cheek, served in the Winter War, and was called “the White Death.” Vasily Zaytsev and Simo Hayha served in this role, as did the “Devil of Ramadi,” whose memoirs inspired a 2014 Clint Eastwood film. Chris Kyle served as, for the point, what type of military sharpshooter?',
     'The second of Maimonides’s 13 Principles of Faith requires belief in this concept. In Islam, this virtue is known as tawhid, and the violation of it is an unforgiveable sin known as shirk. Deuteronomy chapter 6, verse 4 is a statement of this concept that opens the Shema prayer. An early version of this concept was Akhenaten’s belief in the unique divinity of the sun disk, Aten. For the point, name this religious concept, the belief in a single deity.',
     'This man marooned the ship captain Juan de Cartagena after a mutiny broke out aboard the San Antonio, Victoria, and Concepcion. This man, who gave the Pacific Ocean its name, was succeeded by Juan Elcano after he died at Mactan in a battle against the Lapu Lapu people. For the point, name this Portuguese explorer who died in the Philippines before his ships became the first to circumnavigate the globe.',
     'One of these instruments, supposedly the oldest still in existence, was part of a set of 38 made for King Charles IX of France. Giuseppe Tartini wrote a G minor sonata for it nicknamed “Devil’s Trill.” During the Baroque era, this instrument was made by luthiers in Cremona such as Amati and Guarneri. A virtuoso who was rumored to have sold his soul to the devil, Niccolo Paganini, played, for the point, what high-pitched string instrument made by Antoni Stradivari?',
     'This commodity’s trade was once dominated by John Glassford and other 18th century Glasgow merchants, known as its “lords.” Sir Walter Raleigh popularized this commodity in England, and a 1730 English law regulating this crop created warehouses to inspect it at places like Alexandria, Virginia. For the point, name this commodity that, after John Rolfe introduced its seeds to Jamestown, quickly became the dominant cash crop in the Chesapeake region.',
     'While in exile, this man committed suicide in Bithynia after serving as an admiral for the Seleucid Empire. Fabius Maximus strategized that avoiding fighting this man in open battle would wear down his forces; after that policy was abandoned, this man enveloped a huge army at the Battle of Cannae. This general was finally defeated at the Battle of Zama by Scipio Africanus. For the point, name this Carthaginian general who brought elephants across the Alps to attack his nemesis, Rome.',
     'In this film, George goes blind and eventually dies after being struck by a soldier found resting on a U-boat. On a train ride at the end of this film, Adam asks a character to read a newspaper that contains the recently delivered “We shall fight to the beaches” speech. In this film, members of the RAF try to help with the central effort, in which “little ships” end up saving over 300,000 troops. For the point, name this 2017 film about a massive 1940 evacuation from France in World War II.',
     'On this man’s last day in office, he vetoed a Bonus Bill proposed by John Calhoun. Both of this president’s vice presidents, George Clinton and Elbridge Gerry, died in office. A portrait of George Washington was saved by this man’s wife, Dolley, right before British troops took over the White House during the burning of Washington D.C. in 1814. For the point, name this successor of Thomas Jefferson who led the US during the War of 1812 as the fourth President.',
     'A kingdom of these people became fractured thanks to infighting between Dingane and Mpande A kingdom of these people became fractured thanks to infighting between Dingane           and Mpande       when they failed to check the advance of the voortrekkers. These people organized their military into groups called impis and used the buffalo horn formation to great effect at Isandlwana against European troops; however, their capital of Ulundi was eventually burned down in a war with the British. For the point, name this South African empire that was once led by Shaka.',
     'One of this ruler’s campaigns is fictionalized in a painting where his name appears engraved on a rock next to Hannibal and Charlemagne. Although this ruler actually used a mule, that painting shows him riding a rearing horse while crossing the Alps. Jacques-Louis David       painted this man standing in his study at the Tuileries           with a hand tucked inside his vest and showed this man’s wife, Josephine, kneeling in front of this man at his 1804 coronation. For the point, name this emperor of France.',
     'This man began his country’s trade with England after allowing Richard Chancellor to create the Muscovy Company. This man’s rule was supported by the oprichniki secret police, which helped this man purge dissident nobles. The Time of Troubles began after this man’s incapable son Feodor died; this man had accidentally killed his original heir in a rage. For the point, name this final Rurik tsar of Russia whose epithet highlights his cruelty.',
     'Ota Benga was exhibited publicly as an attraction on this continent. On this continent, Alfred Kroeber studied a man nicknamed Ishi who was the last of the Yahi tribe. The settlement of L’Anse aux Meadows [lahnse oh meadow] is located on this continent. Artifacts found at Blackwater Draw on this continent give evidence of the Clovis people in the form of spearheads, and evidence of other pre-Columbian civilizations on this continent include the Cahokia Mounds. For the point, name this home of the Mississippian culture.',
     'The Blatnik Committee investigated corruption in this project, which was inspired by the Pershing Map. Diesel taxes were a primary method of financing this project, which one president intended partly to ensure fast domestic troop transport. That president, who was inspired to undertake this project after seeing the Autobahn in Germany, was Dwight Eisenhower. For the point, name this national infrastructure project that, today, includes nearly 50,000 miles of high speed roadway.',
     'Hundreds of thousands of residents of this state were expelled from their homes during the Nakba. Limited self-government for this state was established by the Oslo Accords in 1993. This state has been led by two presidents, Yasser Arafat and Mahmoud Abbas, and was given observer status in the UN in 2012. Over 100 countries - not including the United States - diplomatically recognize, for the point, what Middle Eastern state whose territory is disputed with Israel?',
     'The ship Royal Sovereign led one line during this battle, under the command of Cuthbert Collingwood. A light wind forced the losing side of this battle to assume a loose crescent-like formation. Before this defeat of Admiral Pierre-Charles Villeneuve, the message “England expects that every man will do his duty” was delivered by semaphore. For the point, name this decisive 1805 British naval victory for Horatio Nelson during the Napoleonic Wars.',
     'This region accidentally became a refuge for the endangered Amur Leopard. After Arthur Bonifas and Mark Barrett were killed in an axe murder in this region, Operation Paul Bunyan was initiated to remove trees near the Bridge of No Return. This region was established after a military stalemate prompted the 1953 Armistice between Syngman Rhee and Kim Il-sung. For the point, name this strip located near the 38th parallel that separates North and South Korea.',
     'Edward R. Murrow said this man repeatedly crossed the line between investigation and persecution in an episode of See It Now. This man and Roy Cohn caused the firings of many gay government employees in the Lavender Scare. At a series of hearings investigating the Army, Senator Joseph Welch asked this man “Have you no sense of decency?” For the point, name this Wisconsin Senator who claimed 205 State Department officials were communists at the peak of the 1950s Red Scare.',
     'This empire’s forces were decimated at the Battle of Khalkhin Gol by Georgy Zhukov. This country’s Unit 731 experimented on people during a war begun by a battle at the Marco Polo Bridge. Six years earlier, this country staged an explosion near Mukden to invade and create the puppet state Manchukuo. The 1945 Jewel Voice radio broadcast announced the surrender of, for the point, what country after its cities of Hiroshima and Nagasaki were bombed in World War II?',
     'This leader and Nicholas II exchanged a friendly series of telegrams mere weeks before the outbreak of World War I. During the Boxer Rebellion, this leader gave the “Hun Speech,” which would later become a derogatory term for his own soldiers. This cousin of George V and Nicholas II allied with Austria-Hungary to form the Central Powers. For the point, name this last German Kaiser, who reigned during World War I.',
     'During this event, the 17th Street Canal and the London Avenue Canal suffered massive failures that flooded 80% of the city, with significant damage in the Lower Ninth Ward. One man who resigned in the aftermath of this event had been told “Brownie, you’re doing a heck of a job” by the President. FEMA was widely criticized for its response to, for the point, what 2005 hurricane that caused massive flooding in New Orleans?',
     'This event’s name was coined on an infamous April Sunday after 20 black blizzards formed at once. While fleeing from this event, Florence Owens Thompson was photographed by Dorothea Lange in a print titled Migrant Mother. Cattle overgrazing and the belief that “rain follows the plow” were catalysts for this event. Many “Okies” went to California to escape, for the point, what Depression-era ecological disaster that ruined agriculture in the Great Plains?',
     'A workers strike in this country’s city of Poznan led to the ascension of the moderate Wladyslaw Gomulka. In this country,theInterfactory Strike Committee issued 21 demands that led to the Gdansk Agreement. This country’s government was reformed after the Round Table Agreement, which included the trade union Solidarity. Pope John Paul II called for a peaceful revolution in this country, his homeland. For the point, name this Eastern European country that Lech Walesa led from Warsaw.',
      'A central event in the formation of this group was the adoption of the Great Law of Peace. This group agreed to a series of treaties with the British collectively called the Covenant Chain, and this group fought against the French over control of the fur trade in the Beaver Wars. The Tuscarora joined this group in 1722, leading this group to adopt the nickname the Six Nations. Hiawatha was a leader of, for the point, what confederacy of northeastern Native American tribes?',
      'This man’s admiral Piri Reis captured the Portuguese outposts of Muscat and Aden. Another of this man’s admirals, Hayreddin Barbarossa, docked in Toulon thanks to his alliance with Francis I of France. ThismanconqueredmuchofHungaryaftertheBattleofMoh ́acs.Thoughthisruleroversaw a failed Siege of Malta against the Knights Hospitaller and failed to capture Vienna in 1526, he expanded his empire to its greatest extent. For the point, name this Ottoman ruler, known as “the Magnificent.”',
      'Beveridge curves are used to model this concept, and an empirical relationship between this quantity and a country’s GDP is given by Okun’s law. An “inflation barrier” prevents the full eradication of this economic concept, a theory that developed after stagflation in the 1970s combined inflation and this phenomenon. The negative effects of this concept were dealt with historically by the English Poor Laws. For the point, name this economic phenomenon in which people are unable to find work.',
      'In this city, attempts to train citizens in human resources management led to the creation of a fully-foreign-owned “Knowledge Village.” This city established free economic zones in the Internet City district and Jebel Ali Harbor. A hotel in this city is often misquoted as being rated seven stars and is shaped like a sail. The Burj Al Arab hotel and the world’s tallest building, the Burj Khalifa, are located in, for the point, what largest city of the United Arab Emirates?',
      'In 1919, thousands of protesters marched to this location to oppose the 21 Demands and urge the return of territory in the Shandong peninsula. The May Fourth Movement gathered in this location, where a foam statue called the Goddess of Democracy was erected in 1989. Mao Zedong’s mausoleum is found in this location, which also includes his portrait adorning a large gate. For the point, name this public square where, in 1989, a lone man repeatedly blocked a column of tanks in Beijing.',
      'A man who served in this position under Jefferson and Madison moved from his estate of Friendship Hill to New York City when he became the first president of NYU. This cabinet position was held from 1801 to 1814 by Albert Gallatin. The first holder of this position drafted the Report on Manufactures and lobbied for a tax on whiskey to help pay down the national debt. The US Mint is overseen by, for the point, what cabinet position first held by Alexander Hamilton?',
      'The central portion of this building was surrounded by the hekhal. An earthquake in 363 AD may have prevented a project to reconstruct this building, which was expanded under Herod the Great and destroyed in 70 AD by Roman soldiers. This building’s former location is now occupied by the Dome of the Rock and the Al-Aqsa Mosque. The Holy of Holies was contained in, for the point, what Jewish holy site in Jerusalem?',
      'This colony’s government once defrauded natives of all the land a runner could reach in 36 hours, a treaty that became known as “the Walking Purchase.” This colony, which was regulated by a “charter of privileges,” purchased much of its land in treaties with the Lenape tribe. To pay a debt owed to the founder’s father, Charles II granted the royal charter creating this colony, whose name means “forest land.” For the point, name this colony, founded as a refuge for Quakers, whose cities included Philadelphia.',
      'The philosopher Thomas Bradwardine held this position for two months shortly before his death. A holder of this position fled to France after he was condemned at a trial held at Northampton Castle, prior to which he had refused to sign the Constitutions of Clarendon. Stephen Langton feuded with King John while he held this position. In 1170, King Henry II ordered the murder of the holder of this position. For the point, name this English religious position held by Thomas Becket.',
      'In this country, the Berkut police force was disbanded after a violent suppression of the “Heavenly Hundred” protesters. Minor skirmishes continue to plague this country’s region of Donbass. This country’s Independence Square was the site of the Euromaidan protests, part of a 2014 revolution that ousted Viktor Yanukovych. During the ensuing instability, this country had a Black Sea territory annexed by Vladimir Putin. For the point, name this country that lost the Crimea to neighboring Russia and is governed from Kiev.',
      'The GRUNK briefly held power in this nation, where intellectuals and other “New People” were executed during “Year Zero.” This country, which was ruled by King Sihanouk until his 1970 overthrow, was the site of “killing fields” during a period when it was known as Democratic Kampuchea and its Communist Party carried out purges under the direction of Pol Pot. For the point, name this Southeast Asian country once ruled by the Khmer Rouge.',
      'This composer’s second collaboration with librettist Lorenzo da Ponte had its “Champagne Aria” bowdlerized by Imperial censors. For another opera by this man, Da Ponte preemptively removed an anti-nobility speech from the original Pierre Beaumarchais play; in that opera, Susanna marries Count Almaviva’s servant. For the point, name this Austrian composer of Don Giovanni and The Marriage of Figaro who also wrote the serenade Eine Kleine Nachtmusik.',
      'In this city, baseball player Willie Horton tried to quell a riot with a speech delivered from the rooftop of a car. Several people were killed near the Algiers Motel in this city during the 1967 Twelfth Street Riot, which prompted governor George Romney to dispatch the National Guard to this city. A five-dollar-a-day wage was offered to laborers in this city by Henry Ford. For the point, name this Michigan city where the big three American automakers are headquartered.',
      'In its effort to fight this disease, the NFIP built a facility to mass produce HeLa cells. Albert Sabin developed both an oral vaccine for this disease and an intense rivalry with another vaccine inventor, who asked “Could you patent the sun?” to explain why he didn’t seek profits. The March of Dimes was founded to fight this disease in 1938. Jonas Salk developed a vaccine for, for the point, what mostly eradicated disease that causes muscle weakness and afflicted Franklin Roosevelt?',
      'This world leader adopted the Sinatra Doctrine, allowing allied nations to “choose their own way.” This leader faced a coup from the hardline Gang of Eight, though it was thwarted when Boris Yeltsin gave a speech from atop a tank. This man’s reforming policies of glasnost and perestroika helped speed up the breakup of his country. For the point, name this final leader of the Soviet Union.',
      'Early in this war, Fort Budapest managed to stay out of enemy hands despite an overwhelming attack in Operation Badr. Shuttle diplomacy initiated by Henry Kissinger helped negotiate an end to this war, leading its winner to withdraw to the Purple Line. This war, which led to the downfall of Golda Meir’s government, began when an Arab alliance breached the Bar-Lev line with a surprise attack. For the point, name this 1973 war in which Israel was attacked on the Jewish Day of Atonement.',
      'This novel’s author described it as “neither an accusation nor a confession.” In this novel, Tjaden gets revenge on Himmelstoss, and another character feels remorse at the stabbing of G ́erard Duval, having returned to the army from seventeen days of leave to see his family. As Fredrich Mu ̈ller dies,hegivesKemmerich’sbootstothisnovel’sprotagonist,PaulBau ̈mer.Forthepoint,name this Erich Maria Remarque novel about life in the German trenches of World War I.',
      'Popular uprisings in this city began after the student Jan Palach, a frees peech protester, set himself on fire in Wenceslas Square. During a revolution centered in this city, Antonin Novotny was replaced by the moderate Alexander Dubcek,whose attempt to create“socialism with a human face” was crushed by a Soviet invasion. A period of liberalization known as this city’s “Spring” took place in, for the point, what capital of Czechoslovakia?',
      'During this war, the CIA tortured and killed insurgents in the Phoenix Program. Creighton Abrams replaced William Westmoreland as general in this war, in which “tunnel rats” fought in caves and navy pilot John McCain participated in bombing runs during Operation Rolling Thunder. Chemical weapons like Agent Orange were used in, for the point, what Southeast Asian war that ended with Saigon being renamed Ho Chi Minh City?',
      'This leader chaired a conference at which his country acquired New Guinea and Namibia. This leader edited the Ems Dispatch, triggering a war in which this leader’s country captured Napoleon III. This leader’s Minister of Education, Adalbert Falk, established state control of education via the May Laws, part of his anti-Catholic Kulturkampf. The “great questions of the time” would be answered by “blood and iron” according to, for the point, what Iron Chancellor of Prussia?',
      'At this structure’s opening ceremony, George Nares’s Newport controversially surged past the imperial Eagle. A closure of this structure caused the Yellow Fleet to be trapped for eight years. Lester Pearson was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize for mediating a 1956 conflict in which British and French paratroopers tried to reclaim it from Gamal Abdel Nasser, who had nationalized it. For the point, name this Egyptian waterway that linked the Mediterranean to the Red Sea.',
      'After a routine traffic stop in this city in 2017, Jocques Clemmons was shot by a police officer, leading to protests against its first female mayor, Megan Barry. This port on the Cumberland River was the northern terminus of the Natchez Trace and was the first state capital to fall to the Union in the Civil War. This city contains a full-scale replica of the Parthenon, as well as Vanderbilt University. For the point, name this center of country music and capital of Tennessee.',
      'This person got in trouble with the National Labor Union after she supported using female strikebreakers during a printers’ strike. Ward Hunt fined this woman a hundred dollars for illegally casting a vote in the 1872 election in Rochester. Four years earlier, this woman co-founded The Revolution with Elizabeth Cady Stanton to advocate for women’s suffrage. For the point, name this American suffragette whose portrait once appeared on the dollar coin.',
      'This man’s party was the target of the Aventine Secession after he changed his country’s voting system with the Acerbo Law. After this man was rescued by Otto Skorzeny, he led the Republic of Salo, which relied on German forces to control the northern half of a country as Victor Emmanuel III regained power from this man in the south. For the point, name this fascist dictator who took power after his militia, called the Blackshirts, marched on Rome in 1922.',
      'In 2004, an Army Ranger who had given up a career in this sport was killed by friendly fire in Afghanistan. In addition to Pat Tillman, this sport was played professionally by Dave Duerson, Junior Seau, and Aaron Hernandez, each of whom were posthumously diagnosed with CTE, a form of chronic brain damage that results from numerous head injuries. For the point, name this sport whose professional league has controversially denied a link between brain damage and concussions received while playing positions like linebacker and quarterback.',
      'This politician was ridiculed for claiming “there is no Soviet domination of Eastern Europe” in a debate. This politician, who encouraged fiscal responsibility to combat inflation in the Whip Inflation Now campaign, signed the Helsinki Accords to improve relations with communist Europe. This president declared “our long national nightmare is over” after taking office in 1974. For the point, name this US president who pardoned his predecessor, Richard Nixon.',
      'This city was home to a lower-class district known as the Subura. Soldiers raised in this city were trained on a large field known as the Campus Martius, and its Temple of Janus only opened its doors in times of war. This city’s sewer, the Cloaca Maxima, drained a swamp that became the site of the first forum. This city was situated on seven hills and was legendarily founded by Romulus and Remus. For the point, name this city on the Tiber River, the namesake of an Italian empire.',
      'Gouverneur Morris wrote this passage, which was cited in Casement v. Squier to justify the lack of a jury. Courts have defended the practice of eminent domain by citing this text’s call to “promote the general Welfare.” This text also calls to “provide for the common defence” and “establish Justice” as methods to “form a more perfect Union.” For the point, name this one-sentence text that begins “We the People of the United States” and introduces the US Constitution.',
      'A leader of this country established its Opportunities assistance program and sharply devalued its currency when he became president in December 1994. Factories called maquiladoras were established in this country during the rule of president Ernesto Zedillo. A rebel in this country adopted the name Subcomandante Marcos and began the Zapatista insurgency in 1994. For the point, name this country that is a member of NAFTA with its two northern neighbors.',
      'Joseph-Marie Jacquard names a type of this material with complex designs, as well as the machine used for producing it. Another highly decorative type of this material, often using floral patterns, is named for Damascus. Lowell was the site of several strikes of primarily female workers in this industry. For the point, name this kind of material often produced by weaving the fibers from linen or wool.',
      'An early offensive in this battle was Joseph Hooker’s assault on the Dunker Church, which led to heavy fighting in Miller’s Cornfield. A Union objective in the southern part of this battle was nicknamed Burnside’s Bridge. Fighting over the Sunken Road led to a stalemate in this battle, which was followed by Robert Lee’s withdrawal of the Confederate army from Maryland. For the point, name this Civil War battle with the highest one-day death toll in American history.',
      'After Catholics were persecuted in this kingdom, Louis Tromelin led an invasion force. Grover Cleveland was told that the US did not interfere in a rebellion in this kingdom in the Morgan Report. After the overthrow of this kingdom, Lorrin Thurston refused to become president, leading to Sanford Dole’s leadership. This Kingdom had the “Bayonet Constitution” imposed on Queen Liliuokalani. For the point, name this Pacific island kingdom that followed Alaska to become the 50th US state.',
      'This denomination’s founder studied under Phineas Quimby, but later disavowed his “New Thought” movement. “Absent treatment” is practiced by members of this faith, which distributes works like Pulpit and Press and Manual of the Mother Church in its “Reading Rooms.” Recovery from a spinal injury inspired the beginnings of, for the point, what Christian sect, founded in the 19th century by Mary Baker Eddy, that believes illnesses can be cured through prayer?',
      'In a battle fought at this location, James Abercrombie decided not to deploy the full power of his artillery on Rattlesnake Hill, leading to a decisive defeat despite his superior numbers. This U.S. location was the site of a 1758 defensive victory for Louis-Joseph de Montcalm. Cannons from this location were transported to Boston in the Noble Train of Artillery after this location was captured by Benedict Arnold and Ethan Allen in a night raid. For the point, name this fort that once guarded a defensive strait near the south end of Lake Champlain.',
      'This composer arranged a campaign song that had been directed against James Blaine, “The Dodger,” as part of his Old American Songs. Eugene Goossens commissioned a piece by this man named for a Henry Wallace speech about the “century” of the title figure; that piece for brass and percussion was written during World War II. Martha Graham choreographed a work by this composer that features a setting of the Shaker hymn “Simple Gifts.” For the point, name this American composer of Fanfare for the Common Man and the ballet Appalachian Spring.',
      'Europeans used this commodity to trade with the 13 Factories in the Canton System. This commodity was brought to China when Spanish galleons traveled from Acapulco to Manila. Britain used this metal to trade for tea with China, before realizing that selling opium could reverse the flow of this commodity. Before traveling to Asia, this commodity was often mined in Bolivia via the mit ́a system at Potos ́ı. Chinese yuanbao ingots were made of gold and, for the point, what other precious metal?',
      'During one battle at this location in 279 BC, Brennus managed to encircle the opposing forces, allowing him to move on to a sack of Delphi. In another battle at this location, a Phocian force on a hill was left to watch their enemies march by, encircling that enemy via a pass around this location revealed by Ephialtes. A 480 BC naval battle at Artemisium happened at the same time as a battle at, for the point, what “hot gates” where Leonidas was defeated with his force of around 300 Spartan soldiers?',
      'This country’s “art of impermanence” is lauded in a work about its aesthetic sensibilities titled In Praise of Shadows. A growing population of acutely socially withdrawn individuals in this country was studied in The Anatomy of Dependence by one of its contemporary psychologists. A wartime study of this country funded by the U.S. government first distinguished between guilt and shame cultures and was written by Ruth Benedict. For the point, name this Asian country described in The Chrysanthemum and the Sword',
      'In 2007, 17 citizens of this country were killed in Nisour Square by private contractors. Three years earlier, the killing of four members of that private company, Blackwater, sparked the first Battle of Fallujah in this country. An invasion of this country was predicated on its attempt to buy yellowcake uranium from Niger. For the point, name this country that was named with Iran and North Korea in the “Axis of Evil” by George W. Bush in 2002, a year before the US invaded it to depose Saddam Hussein.',
      'One of this leader’s security chiefs was nicknamed the “Bloody Dwarf” for his enjoyment of torturing political opponents. Leftist opposition to this leader was known as the United Opposition, which was co-organized by the author of The Revolution Betrayed. This man had Andrey Vyshinsky prosecute Lev Kamenev and Grigory Zinoviev in show trials, and had Nikolai Yezhov lead the Great Purge. For the point, name this leader of the Soviet Union through World War II.',
      'This empire was briefly interrupted by Sher Shah of the Sur Empire during the reign of Humayun. One ruler of this kingdom created his own religion called the Din-i Ilahi, encouraged learning at his House of Worship, and abolished the jizya tax on non-Muslims. This empire began with Ibrahim Lodi’s loss at Panipat in 1526. Another ruler of this empire built a mausoleum for his wife Mumtaz. For the point, name this empire ruled by Babur, Akbar the Great, and Shah Jahan, who built the Taj Mahal.',
      'North America’s continental pole of inaccessibility lies in this US state’s Pine Ridge Reservation, where Black Coyote and others were killed. Jewel Cave National Monument is found in this state, where the incomplete Crazy Horse Memorial is planned to become the world’s largest monument. Those sites are located in this state’s Black Hills, which also contains Gutzon Borglum’s monument of four American presidents. The Wounded Knee incident took place in, for the point, what home state of Mount Rushmore?',
      'John de Vere commanded the vanguard at both this battle and, two years later, a quashed rebellion at Stoke Field. Nine days after this battle, William Caxton published Malory’s Le Morte D’Arthur, supposedly as commentary on this battle’s most notable death. A full-on charge of roughly 1,000 knights was ordered by the loser of this battle, who had earlier served as Duke of Gloucester under his brother Edward IV. Richard III was killed at this battle, after which Henry VII was crowned. For the point, name this decisive 1485 battle of the Wars of the Roses.',
      'Ebenezer Hoar led an anti-slavery faction of this party that labeled themselves “Conscience,” as opposed to “Cotton.” This party supported higher tariffs, infrastructure subsidies, and a national bank under the American System. A President from this party known as “His Accidency” was shunned by this party after signing the Tariff of 1842. Winfield Scott was the last Presidential nominee of, for the point, what American political party whose leaders, like Henry Clay, opposed Andrew Jackson’s Democrats in the 19th century?',
      'This city is home to an airport that is named in honor of Prime Minister Adolfo Suarez and is the busiest in its country. This city’s Vicente Calder ́on Stadium, which hosted its final game in 2017, included a stand of seating built over the M-30 highway that circles this city; a replacement stadium is being built a short drive from this city’s aforementioned Barajas Airport. Nearly 200 people died in a 2004 terrorist attack on the train system of, for the point, what capital city of Spain?',
      'The previous holder of this man’s current position ended his tenure by inviting the Foo Fighters to play “Everlong.” This man, who was attacked by conservatives for his work as the host of the 2006 White House Correspondent’s Dinner, led a 2010 “March to Keep Fear Alive” that was paired with a “Rally to Restore Sanity” led by colleague Jon Stewart. David Letterman was succeeded by, for the point, what host ofCBS’s Late Show who once hosted a Comedy Central "Report?"',
      'This general ordered his troops not to fire “on our brothers” during the Battle of Aspromonte . This European refused to command Union troops, legendarily because Abraham Lincoln would not declare the abolition of slavery as the Union’s goal. This man conquered the Bourbon Kingdom of the Two Sicilies in his Expedition of the Thousand. Count Cavour, Giuseppe Mazzini, and this man were known respectively as the brain, soul, and sword of the Risorgimento. For the point, name this “hero of two worlds” who led the redshirts in the fight for Italian unification.',
      'A Sun newspaper in this city was managed for forty years by the anti-McCarthyist real estate developer Hank Greenspun. This city’s airport is named after the sponsor of a 1950 Internal Security Act, Pat McCarran. The gangster Bugsy Siegel financed the development of the Flamingo Hotel in this city, where Frank Sinatra performed shows at Caesars Palace. For the point, name this Nevada city where mobsters helped develop a “strip” of casinos.',
      'In a battle near Jindo Island, this weapon was deployed in a frontal attack after changing currents caused enemy ships to collide. These vessels, which were employed at the Battle of Myeongnyang in the Imjin War, had a dragon’s mouth mounted at their front to exhale either flames or a smokescreen. Yi Sun-sin re-designed this type of ship, which is named for the plates covering its top. For the point, name these large Korean warships whose shell-like armor earned a comparison to a reptile.',
      'An architect who worked in this city designed its Carson Pirie Scott department store. Louis Sullivan was part of a school of architects named for this city, where American Gothic can be viewed. A brick structure in this city with art glass windows and a distinctive horizontal roof was built in the Prairie Style; that building is the Robie House in Hyde Park and was designed by Frank Lloyd Wright. For the point, name this city that was rebuilt after a “Great” 1871 fire.',
      'After forces on the losing side of this battle ran out of weapons, they threw oranges and lemons. This battle served as revenge for the siege of Famagusta. For maneuvering his forces away in this battle, Andrea Doria was accused of cowardice, though his ally, Don John of Austria led the winning side. For the point, name this last large-scale galley engagement, a naval battle in which the Ottoman Empire was soundly defeated by the Catholic Holy League in 1571.',
      'This man transformed Tammany Hall from a “speech-making club” into a political machine for anti-federalists. As Vice President, this man oversaw the Senate’s elimination of speaking limits and the impeachment of Supreme Court Justice Samuel Chase for partisan opinions. The Twelfth Amendment passed after this man was almost elected President while running on Thomas Jefferson’s ticket. For the point, name this man who, after his political career was essentially over, shot and killed Alexander Hamilton in a duel.',
      'This work devotes two chapters to geographical distribution, including a brief discussion of boulders washed up on the Azores. Charles Lyell helped arrange the publication of this work, whose ideas were later applied to mankind in The Descent of Man. The study of finches and other creatures of the Galapagos Islands during a journey on the Beagle inspired, for the point, what 1859 work that introduced the idea of evolution by natural selection, written by Charles Darwin?',
      'A popular 18th century road named for these objects began in Philadelphia and worked through the backcountry to Augusta, Georgia. A specialized box was added to the back of these objects as made by the Studebaker family to provide storage and cooking utilities. The large Conestoga type of these vehicles was covered and could be caulked to cross rivers, and the “chuck” type served as a mobile kitchen. For the point, name these vehicles that transported American settlers and goods along the Oregon Trail prior to the expansion of railroads.',
      'During this campaign, a side expedition was made to Samosata, and Kilij       Arslan lost the Battle of Dorylaeum. In this campaign, one side rallied forces against Kerbogha by finding the Holy Lance. Bohemond of Taranto defended Antioch during this conflict, which was preceded by Peter the Hermit’s fight against the Seljuk Turks. “God wills it” was Pope Urban II’s cry for, for the point, what military campaign called at the Council of Clermont in 1096 to capture the Holy Land?',
      'This man may have issued the earliest mention of human rights on a cylinder, discovered in 1879, that has also led some biblical scholars to believe that this man ended the Babylonian Captivity. After defeating Croesus of Lydia and the Median empire, this ruler established a new capital at Pasargadae.This man’s son,Cambyses II, carried on the Achaemenid line.For the point, name this founder of the Persian Empire.',
      'The Spooner Amendment established a William Howard Taft-led government in this country, which was later granted independence via the Tydings-McDuffie Act. American involvement in this country was satirized in Mark Twain’s “A Defense of General Funston,” a criticism of Frederick Funston’s capture of Emilio Aguinaldo, this country’s first President. For the point, name this Pacific island country where, in 1898, George Dewey destroyed the Spanish fleet in Manila Bay.',
      'A novel by this author begins with a man refusing to transport a group of Cubans into the US, but then agreeing to traffic some Chinese people instead. This author, who wrote about the smuggler Harry Morgan in To Have and Have Not, wrote a novel in which Anselmo is killed by flying shrapnel when he blows up a bridge during the Spanish Civil War. The demolitions expert Robert Jordan was created by, for the point, what American author of For Whom the Bell Tolls?',
      'Gabriel Wells bought one of these works and broke it apart, selling its individual leaves. Guillaume- Franc ̧ois Debure’s discovery of one of these in the Mazarin Library inspired an alternative name for these works, which are versions of the Vulgate. Only 49 copies of this work are known to have survived from the 1450s, when most of them were created in Mainz. The first major work to take advantage of the metal movable type was, for the point, what religious text named for the inventor of the printing press?',
      'A politician of this ethnicity named James Carroll twice served as acting Prime Minister. In World War I, Apirana Ngata supported a pioneer unit composed of these people, who developed the King Movement to unite on the North Island in the 19th century. Infighting among these people took place during the Musket Wars. Representatives of these indigenous peoples are guaranteed 7 electorates in a parliament at Wellington. William Hobson signed the Treaty of Waitangi with, for the point, what native peoples of New Zealand?',
      'In February 2017, this country’s President joked that if he could, he would ban pineapple on pizza. The prime minister of this country resigned in 2016 after the release of the Panama Papers. This country’s Pirate Party came in third place in October 2016 parliamentary elections, winning 10 seats in the Althing. Guoni Johannesson is president of, for the point, what Scandinavian country where the 2010 Eyjafjallajokull eruption cancelled flightsout of Reykjavik?',
      'In this city, tossing arrows at a statue of a divination god named Hubal was a religious rite practiced by this city’s ruling Quraysh tribe in the 5th-century. The “Year of the Elephant” refers to a story where an invading army’s leading elephant stopped outside the gates of this city; that elephant stopped due to the birth of a prophet from this city, whose move to neighboring Medina was known as the hijra. For the point, name this home of the Kaaba and birthplace of Muhammad.',
      'This president fired his Attorney General, J. Howard McGrath, when McGrath refused to cooperate with a corruption investigation. Congress weakened labor unions by overriding this man’s veto of the Taft-Hartley Act. This president announced Executive Order 9961, which integrated the armed forces, as part of his Fair Deal. For the point, name this man who defeated Thomas Dewey to maintain the presidency in 1948, having first gained the office after FDR’s death.',
      'During this event, a man named Belling was freed in the storming of Rochester Castle. Some of this event’s perpetrators took the pseudonym Piers Plowman. Archbishop Simon Sudbury was executed during this event, whose leader was killed by William Walworth. This event during the reign of Richard II began as a reaction to the Statute of Labourers, which tried to ban pay raises. Wat Tyler led, for the point, what 1381 rebellion named for its impoverished protesters?',
      'The first governor of this U.S. state controversially met with Andre Michaux during the Citizen Genet Affair and was named Isaac Shelby. Andrew Jackson vetoed funding of a construction project in this state called the Maysville Road. A politician who represented this state outlined the American System and became Secretary of State in 1824 in the Corrupt Bargain. Henry Clay represented, for the point, what US state where Fort Knox was built just south of Louisville?',
      'A dictator in this nation once bathed in dolphin blood and changed currency to denominations of 45 and 90 units. A leader of this country implemented the order, “when the army shoots, it shoots to hit,” during its 8888 Uprising. Ne Win was deposed in this country, where a national junta put down protests during UN Secretary General U Thant’s funeral. Buddhists are persecuting Rohingya Muslims in, for the point, what country where Aung San Suu Kyi [chee] is state counsellor?',
      'In 2013, a woman was arrested in Lens [lehn] for defacing this painting by writing “AE911” in black marker. This painting is an allegory of the July Revolution, which rocked Paris for three days in 1830, and shows a figure in a yellow dress and Phrygian cap stepping over several bodies. For the point, name this Eugene Delacroix masterpiece whose title figure waves the French tricolor.',
      'The losing side in this battle used forts supposedly named for its commander’s mistresses, including “Claudine” and “Gabrielle.” This battle was set up three months prior by the losing side’s Operation Castor, a reinforcement by airdrop. During this two-month-long siege, Charles Piroth committed suicide after his forces were surrounded by artillery pieces hidden in the mountains. For the point, name this 1954 victory for Vo Nguyen Giap that led to French withdrawal from Vietnam.',
      'During this war, Count von Schwerin noted that snowblindness caused a miscalculation of the distance to the enemy; he was ignored, but his side won the Battle of Mollwitz anyway. King George II led an army in this war’s Battle of Dettingen, the last time a British king led troops in battle. The invasion of Silesia by Frederick the Great began this war, which was ended by the Treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle. For the point, name this war that began after the Pragmatic Sanction of 1713 allowed Maria Theresa to hold a certain throne.',
      'In one of these locations, Laboratory Number Seven is the site of phonoscopy research that analyzes voice patterns in encrypted telephone calls. A resident of one of these locations sews bread from his morning meal into his mattress for safekeeping. Lev Rubin is a resident of one of these locations in the novel The First Circle. Alexander Solzhenitsyn’s novel One Day in the Life of Ivan Denisovich is set in, for the point, what type of location where Soviet dissidents were detained, often in Siberia?',
      'Two of this man’s three formulations of his most famous concept are named after “Universal Law” and “Autonomy.” This philosopher hypothesized that two constitutional republics will never go to war with each other, an idea described as “Perpetual Peace.” This man popularized the distinction between a priori and a posteriori statements in his 1781 Critique of Pure Reason. The categorical imperative was described by, for the point, what 18th-century German Enlightenment philosopher?',
      'This man’s division rebuilt bridges over the Chickahominy River prior to the Battle of Savage’s Station. The Battle of Port Republic concluded this commander’s string of victories in the Shenandoah Valley. Barnard Elliot Bee claimed that this man’s brigade was responsible for holding the Confederate lines at the First Battle of Bull Run. For the point, name this Confederate commander who was killed by friendly fire at the Battle of Chancellorsville and earned the nickname “Stonewall.”',
      'John Frederick I of Saxony and Philip I of Hesse led a league against this man, but were beaten by him at the Battle of Muhlberg. Francis I also fought this leader in the Italian Wars, but was beaten at Pavia. Due to the Protestant Reformation and the Schmalkaldic League, this Emperor promulgated the doctrine of Cuius Regio, Eius Religio with the Peace of Augsburg. For the point, name this Holy Roman Emperor who called the Diet of Worms [vohms] against Martin Luther.',
      'The cyclic nature of these events was explained by Milutin Milankovitch’s study of eccentricity, axial tilt, and precession. One of the most severe examples of these events occurred after the Great Oxygenation event. A “little” one of these events caused significant agricultural failures in the centuries after a “Medieval Warm Period.” Glaciations may take place during, for the point, what periods in which the surface temperature of the Earth decreases for a significant period of time?',
      'Eugene Rostow condemned this program as comparable to the Gestapo’s actions. General Milton Eisenhower implemented this policy, which included the creation of Civilian Assembly Areas. Fred Korematsu lost his lawsuit against the US government over this policy, which was enacted in Executive Order 9066 by Franklin Roosevelt. Fears of disloyalty after Pearl Harbor were used to justify, for the point, what American policy of forcefully relocating certain Asian-Americans during World War II?',
      'A monopoly over production of these items was struck down in a suit brought by Fleer and Donruss against Topps. In 2013, Bill Mastro confessed to trimming one of these objects that had previously been owned by Wayne Gretzky; that object features Honus Wagner and was originally distributed in cigarette packs. For the point, name these collectible items, one of which erroneously features George W. Bush photoshopped in the stands behind Derek Jeter, the shortstop for the Yankees.',
      'Activists from this territory often protested the US Navy’s shelling of the island of Vieques . Nationalists from this territory attempted to assassinate Harry Truman at the Blair House in 1950. Ricardo Rossello governs this unincorporated territory, where the potential failure of the Guajataca Dam in this territory prompted a mass evacuation of over 70,000 people here in 2017. For the point, name this U.S. territory with capital at San Juan that was devastated by Hurricane Maria.',
      'During this event, the 1201 overflow alarm was correctly ignored. A day after celebrating the end of this event onboard the USS Hornet, President Nixon announced his namesake doctrine at a press conference in Guam. During this event, which was followed by three weeks of quarantine in Houston, Michael Collins remained in the Command Module while the Eagle landed in the Sea of Tranquility. For the point, name this 1969 mission in which Buzz Aldrin and Neil Armstrong became the first men to walk on the moon',
      'This empire expanded into Wagadou after the slave Sakoura seized power, but Sakoura was murdered and control quickly reverted back to the Kolonkan line. Architectural wonders from this empire include as-Saheli’s Djinguereber Mosque and Djenne’s Great Mosque. This empire was supplanted by the Songhai, and its most famous ruler legendarily devalued gold along the Mediterranean during his lavish hajj to Mecca. For the point, name this west African empire that was ruled by Mansa Musa.',
      'In 1923, after people from this country were accused of killing Enrico Tellini, Italy bombarded one of its islands. Italy backed out of the Paris Peace Conference after learning that this country was promised Smyrna, which this country was occupying. Benito Mussolini invaded Albania before failing in his 1940 invasion of this country, whose Metaxas Line fell to the Germans the next year. The Corfu Incident enraged, for the point, what country that was occupied by the Nazis after the fall of Athens?',
      'In this country, the city of Chan Chan was the base of power of the Chimu culture, who occupied a similar region as the earlier Moche       culture. A monkey with a spiraling tail is among the line-figures constructed in this modern country by the Nazca people. A civilization based in what is now this country was legendarily founded by Manco Capac, who established the city of Cusco. For the point, name this country, the base of power of the Inca civilization in South America.',
      'A Supreme Court case dealing with this concept is named for Richard Quirin, one of eight people who were planning acts of sabotage in Operation Pastorius. Access to this concept was upheld in an 1866 case that invalidated the conviction of Lambdin Milligan. The case Ex Parte Merriman ruled that President Lincoln’s suspension of this right was unconstitutional. For the point, name this legal writ in which the legality of a person’s imprisonment is challenged, known by a Latin phrase translating to “bring forth the body.”',
      'When this war broke out, one side warned the USS Vicksburg and other neutral ships in Chemulpo Bay that an attack would take place the next day. General Kuropatkin lost 90,000 men and was forced to retreat from the largest battle of this war, Mukden. The Baltic Fleet was redeployed to join this conflict and relieve Port Arthur, only to be annihilated at the Battle of Tsushima Straits. For the point, name this 1904-1905 war in which an Asian power decisively defeated Tsar Nicholas II’s forces.',
      'The Historia Augusta claims that one of these projects was the “crowning glory” of Septimius Severus’ reign. Another project of this type was largely overseen by governor Quintus Lollius Urbicus, began at Old Kirkpatrick, and includes depictions of conflicts with the Caledonians. Antoninus Pius oversaw one of these projects after succeeding a man who stopped Pict attacks by creating a 73-mile-long example of these structures in Brittania. For the point, name this type of defensive structure built by Hadrian',
      'This man convinced Goldman Sachs to invest 60 million dollars in Chinese gold farms on World of Warcraft, an experience he claims taught him how to organize supporters over the Internet. This man was accused of leaking news to Mike Cernovich in an attempt to oust rival H.R. McMaster, who removed this man from the National Security Council in April 2017. After the Unite the Right Rally in Charlottesville and criticism of his white supremacist opinions, this man resigned from the Trump administration. For the point, name this former White House Chief Strategist and current chairman of Breitbart News.',
      'In 1995, this man’s sons were discovered in KV5, the largest known tomb in the Valley of the Kings. The construction of the Aswan Dam forced the relocation of the Abu Simbel temple, which this ruler commissioned. After two spies enticed this man into fighting by the Orontes River, this husband of Nefertari signed the first ever peace treaty with Hattusilli III after the world’s largest chariot battle. For the point, name this Egyptian ruler who defeated the Hittites at the Battle of Kadesh and was known as “the Great.”',
      'A section of this river flowing through Ojinaga has been called “The Forgotten River” due to overuse and drought. A shift in this river caused the creation of Cordova Island, leading to the Chamizal border dispute and the near-assassination of two presidents in 1909. The question of whether to use the Nueces River or this river to determine a border led to a war that ended with the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo. For the point, name this river on the US-Mexico border.',
      'A law forbidding this practice was central to the 1982 court case Engblom v. Carey, which arose after striking employees were removed from company housing. Several amendments to the Mutiny Act legalized this practice in the American colonies, as did the fourth of the Intolerable Acts. This practice, which was implemented due to a lack of lodging facilities beginning in the French and Indian War, is outlawed by the Third Amendment. For the point, name this practice of forcibly housing troops in private residences.',
      'One of these pieces premiered with lyrics satirizing its country’s loss in the Seven Weeks War. This musical genre was introduced to England by Almack’s social clubs. Maurice Ravel used two Schubert collections of these works for his own “noble and sentimental” works, and denied that World War I influenced a piece of his named for this dance that depicted an imperial ballroom circa 1855. “Tales from the Vienna Woods” and “The Blue Danube” are examples of, for the point, what dance in three-quarter time whose “King” was Johann Strauss Jr.?',
      'A document proposing the American acquisition of this territory described a potential “treason against our posterity” if this territory became “Africanized;” that document was James Buchanan’s Ostend Manifesto. The US established control over this territory via the Platt Amendment, which stipulated conditions for troop withdrawal that were originally promised by the Teller Amendment. For the point, name this Caribbean island where American intervention was trigged by the sinking of the USS Maine in Havana Harbor.',
      'This dynasty was able to mount catapults on paddle-wheel vessels to great effect at the Battle of Caishi. Though this dynasty was the first to establish a standing navy, it was partially conquered by the Jurchen Jin, leading it to be divided into Northern and Southern periods. The Four Great Inventions, including papermaking, printing, gunpowder, and the compass, were discovered during this dynasty. For the point, name this dynasty that fell to Kublai Khan’s Mongols and was thus followed by the Yuan Dynasty.',
      'The source of this river is often incorrectly cited as Lake Tear of the Clouds. The natural widening of this river, known as the Tappan Zee, tricked its namesake into thinking he’d found the Northwest Passage, an idea he gave up on after reaching Troy. A historic railroad bridge converted into a footbridge over this river runs from Poughkeepsie to Highland. For the point, name this river that originates in the Adirondacks, forms the border between New York and New Jersey, and shares its name with the Canadian bay where its namesake was abandoned in 1611.',
      'During testimony in this case, former acting Secretary of State Levi Lincoln controversially requested time to consider whether he should answer any questions. This case was prompted by a writ of mandamus filed by one of the “Midnight Judges,” who had been appointed, in accordance with the Judiciary Act of 1801, at the very end of John Adams’s presidency. For the point, name this 1803 case in which Chief Justice John Marshall established the principle of judicial review.',
      'This author borrowed the title of a speech by Athenian orator Isocrates for a work he wrote to Parliament lashing out against the Licencing Order of 1643. In that work, this man claims “he who destroys a good book kills reason itself.” In another work by this author of Areopagitica, Mulciber is the principle architect of the city of Pandemonium, which is ruled by a character who claims that it is “Better to reign in Hell, than serve in Heaven.” For the point, name this English author who looked to “justify the ways of God to man” in Paradise Lost.',
      'This leader’s country lost the Aozou Strip in the Toyota War against Chad. This leader, who was protected by the all-female Amazonian Guard, claimed responsibility for the 1988 Lockerbie bombings. This man detailed his Third International Theory in the Green Book shortly before taking the title “Brotherly Leader and Guide of the Revolution.” In 2011, this leader was killed near his hometown of Sirte during the Arab Spring. For the point, name this longtime dictator of Libya.',
      'John Pershing nicknamed this man “bandito” after he killed Mexican rebel leader Julio C ́ardenas. This man, who was investigated by reporter Drew Pearson, beat Bernard Montgomery in the Race to Messina. Under Douglas MacArthur, this man led cavalry to suppress the Bonus Army. Before D-Day, this general led a phantom army to confuse German forces, and he directed the relief of the 101st Airborne during the Battle of the Bulge. For the point, name this American general who controversially slapped a soldier suffering from shell shock.',
      'This organization’s membership boomed after they successfully striked against Jay Gould’s Wabash Railroad. Many members of this organization participated in the 1885 Rock Springs Massacre of Chinese immigrants, though authorities could not link this group to the crime. This organization, which was founded as a secret “Noble and Holy Order” by Uriah Stephens, suffered a decline in popularity after it was blamed for the Haymarket Square Riot. For the point, name this briefly-powerful labor group once led by Terence Powderly.',
      'In  1726, a marauding group of these people led by Hemperla were executed in the state of Hesse- Darmstadt. The 1530 Egyptians Act in England targeted these individuals. This group’s flag features a 16-spoked wheel, a reference to their origins in northern India. These nomadic people often moved in caravans, leading many subgroups to be known as travellers. For the point, name this oft-persecuted, dispersed ethnic group that was marked by a brown triangle and murdered in the Porajmos by the Nazis.',
      'This man waged a decade-long campaign against the Ikko-Ikki that culminated in the destruction of Ishiyama Hongan-Ji. This man first rose to prominence when he ambushed an Imagawa army ten times the size of his own. This leader beat his rival Takeda at the Battle of Nagashino, using guns to great effect. After being betrayed by Akechi Mitsuhide, this leader committed suicide at Honno-ji. For the point, name this first of the Three Great Unifiers of Japan, an ally of Tokugawa Ieyasu and Toyotomi Hideyoshi.',
      'Only four men survived an expedition intending to explore this U.S. state, including the chronicler Alvar Cabeza de Vaca. The Narvaez Expedition was formed in 1527 to explore this state. An explorer of this state landed at Charlotte Harbor on the Peace River north of Fort Myers as part of his quest to find the Fountain of Youth. Ponce de Leon led two voyages exploring, for the point, what state where the Spanish established colonies at St. Augustine and Pensacola?',
      'An emerald one of these figures has three sets of gold robes that are replaced by a current monarch at the end of each season. A daibatsu represents a giant sculpture of these figures, two of which were destroyed by the Taliban in Bamyan in 2001. The 9th-century temple of Borobodur on Java in Indonesia contains over 500 statues of these entities, which are often worshipped in Southeast Asia. For the point, name these figures that represent the founder of a religion with Mahayana and Theravada branches.',
      'Hans Eysenck worked with 11-year-old twins to study this characteristic. The Holland Codes use this psychological variable to determine career choice. The MMPI has begun replacing the Jungian Myers-Briggs Type Indicator test for this characteristic, which is also studied by the Rorschach test. Openness to experience and extraversion are elements of, for the point, what concept that describes a person’s individual thoughts and behaviors?',
      'Benoit Mandelbrot was a fellow at this company when he discovered fractal geometry using their technology. This company, which holds the record for the most patents granted to a company, invented ATMs, floppy disks, and the first personal computers. This company developed Deep Thought and Deep Blue for chess matches with Garry Kasparov. For the point, name this company that was propelled by the early leadership of Thomas J. Watson, the namesake of their Jeopardy-playing computer.',
      'These people allied with the Carthaginians against a Phocaean force at the Battle of Alalia. A league of these people consisted of twelve cities, including Clusium. These people, who called themselves the Rasenna, were attacked by invading Gauls at the Battle of Melpum and lost considerable control over the Po Valley. For the point, name this ethnic group located around the Tyrrhenian Sea that, after it lost its city of Veii, assimilated into the Roman Republic.',
      'The first mayor of this city, William Lyon Mackenzie, led a stillborn 1837 uprising that was put down at the Battle of Montgomery’s Tavern. During the War of 1812, Zebulon Pike died attacking this city in the Battle of York, so called because of this city’s former name. A railroad conglomerate built a communications tower in this city that is named after the Canadian National company. For the point, name this city on the shores of Lake Ontario, the economic capital of Canada.',
      'This man accomplished an action that Noel Davis and Stanton Wooster died trying to do. This man’s autobiography, titled We, did not refer to the Ryan aircraft on the cover, but actually to his financial backers. This man won a prize from Raymond Orteig and used his fame to promote airmail. This pilot was celebrated in a 1927 ticker tape parade in New York City after he landed at La Bourget airfield in Paris. For the point, name this aviator who crossed the Atlantic Ocean alone in the Spirit of St. Louis.',
